The lights go red–real drop time. I close my eyes, but my brain is running deep scans on that last cast from Uppinder, affirm? Real humans. Really alive. I tell myself it’s all bullshit; living is docking your aft sphereside in a shit-top arcology, draining genned brandy and scarfing steak from an actual dead cow while sex-bots and pleasure customs polish your undies from the inside out. This? This shit is dying, not living. Dying one drop at a time.
I just caught up with the Who Cast's review of The Unicorn and the Wasp, and I need to add to what I wrote.
(The Twizzler grass was my favorite part of this story.)
So life is good. There are stumbling blocks and there are rough times. But you can always find something that is a positive. And more often than not, I can find more than one. So I leave you with a video my mother sent her girls. It pretty much sums it up.
I would like to thank the king for his supportive words, but to be completely honest; I've got no idea at all what he was on about! But I don't give a shit, sometimes all you've got is friends and their words. There's thought, concern and care in there, I know that....and these days....that's enough.
In general, there is more information and discussion about various scenarios that may come up when the “mass arrests” occur.
Open to all who share the determination to help defend our coast.
Getting the drive itself up and running was no biggie. Transferring the picture files over. Piece o'cake. But the whole iTunes/music files transfer? Another story.
Now that I have eliminated the actual act of smoking, I have discovered the impossible — life does go on. The oral fixation slowly is being dismantled. The love affair between my hand and mouth has evolved into a friendly co-existence. You know, a hand-wipes-mouth-with-napkin kind of relationship.
The summer season has changed. The cicadas have crawled out - much lesser numbers this year; the grasses are changing; and the shortening days have bought out the hunter in our pointer. This next week promises to be cooler - finally a break from the 100+ temps but not from the humidity that has come with the rains. The storms that have gone through the state are real hit and miss - one area will get two inches of rain and an area forty miles away will not get a drop. Much of the state still in drought conditions.
First: the relationship between the DPD and the Duke Police. This issue should have been comprehensively explored by the Bowen/Chambers Committee. But the politically correct duo appeared interest only in information that would cast the lacrosse players in an unfavorable light, and so ignored the matter altogether.
(click on their names for card details)
If you forgive someone, God forgives him but as per Mt. 6/14-15 or Mark 11/25-26, God forgives you also or via versa…
her lower yang;
Maybe Mr. W can pretend to be one after he wraps his movie and is home with me during the day. Or maybe he'll let me get a few more cats to keep me company...
Coming back to this cinema, it is now ensconced between some non-descript building and the Electricity Company of Ghana office at Makola.
The first building, an arsenal, was constructed in 1915, to provide a home for the weapons and ammo that had until that time been stored in the basement of the State Capitol. (Good thing nobody in Texas every heard of Guy Fawkes.) In 1918 the US Army School of Automobile Mechanics (SAM) was opened at Mabry and a number of the present buildings on the base were constructed.
40 wonton (square) wrappers
more ambivalent about sex-reassignment surgery
We ate a lot of sugar when I was little. I’m surprised my sister has any teeth left. She would sit and eat brown sugar right out of the bag. I wasn’t a big sugar eater. I was a hyper little chihuahua. I did put a layer of sugar on top of my Rice Krispies, after they were all properly dunked under the milk. I should add that I added sugar here and there until the cereal was gone. Some people liked to drink the sugar milk leftover, but I never did, despite my mom telling me to finish my bowl…of sugar milk. I would look over at Cheryl and she would just be going at it. I am sure she took in enough sugar for the whole block. People out of sugar knew where to come: The Sugar Shack on the corner of Crystal and Fernwood.
Back to my not-terribly-funny initial comment:
Baked goods have a way of making people feel better. Especially when they're free. So if you're out indulging in retail therapy (or torturing yourself by "just looking") at Henri Bendel this month, beat it to the third floor. Whisper the words “Brownie Bailout” and the fine folks at Alison Nelson's Chocolate Bar will give you a free brownie. Seriously.
Yet between 300 bc and ad 800, many other powerful urban polities developed in the disparate geographic regions surrounding the Valley of Oaxaca, including in the highland valleys of the Mixteca and lower Río Verde Valley along the Pacific Coast.
*Sighing heavily, stomping and slamming doors
2/3 C butter, softened
So perhaps I ought not to have been all that surprised at the outcome of my call to him less than 12 hours ago:
The new hardware did not. :) It had a plate the latch was installed in. I thought this was going to be a major pain in the booty to deal with when I first realized this, it’s not a big deal at all. Hang in there folks…this is the fun part. ;)
And to me, that's quite a prize.
Sunday, July 22
because of their iniquities, are afflicted. Their soul abhorred all manner of
The Ark of the Covenant is ablaze
This week’s post is gonna be short n sweet
Several of the Best Picture contenders in recent years are represented by low-budget indie films, such as Juno (2007) and Little Miss Sunshine (2006). Mind you, they might have reaped millions from their Oscar nods after the fact.
of our favorite bands: Delay, Bomb the Music Industry, and Good Luck.
But how do you expect me to live alone with just me?–This is what you have asked me to do–to live as an O and a B (birthmom and birthdad’s names) ALONE. I am an O, and a B, and Stirrett, and a Nagy, just as my daughter is a Nagy and a Norelus–both. Her birthmom’s picture is on our fridge because we acknowledge that she has more than one set of parents.
The fir tree was (and is) a symbol of life lasting even through death, the promise of life and light renewed, and a reminder that beneath the snow, the Earth-heart beats on. Holly and Ivy were green, too, but they were also symbols of the Green Man, the Forest Lord, Jack o' the Green - the God primeval. The Holly King and the Ivy King, the old and the young, the constant, changing balance. Deep stuff, yo.
You will see a dropdown menu of all devices that have software updates. Select your device, and then download the latest software. The newest will always be at the top. NOTE: This is around 100 MB, and may take a while to download depending on your internet speed.
Incentivize. Nothing will help increase results more than offering an exclusive benefit for those that complete the survey. Be it a small gift with their next purchase, a coupon or a secret sale, a little something special to show them you appreciate their time will help boost participation and build customer loyalty.
Dinner: Campbell’s Beef Noodle Soup (140 calories), Breyer French Vanilla Ice cream (140 calories)
Will I wear it?
John J. Wall
On Saturday August 22, 2009 the commercial “CAN’T LOSE” is scheduled to shoot interior and exterior scenes at 109 St. James Place between Greene Avenue & Gates Avenue
Tools: SNSS Pennants & More dies, Spellbinders label 18 Nestabilities, SU circle punches, SU Sizzix Textured Impressions Square Lattice
*THE SHARDS OF GLASS THAT COMPRISE THE ENTITY OF OUR STORIED LIVES COME TOGETHER IN A SENSICAL FASHION ONLY WHEN PURPOSE IS FOUND&IF NOT FOR THE PERSEVERANT DETERMINATION TO GET OUT OF FAMILAIR COMFORT, THIS PURPOSE WOULD NOT BE FOUND.
Where: Newcastle Region Library, Lovett Gallery Laman Street
Reading that and thinking of the staggering unemployment our country has faced for the past decade, reinforced that we really need to see more companies like this. Co-founders Richard Ford and Jeff Osborn have created a business model that is built on the premise that not only will the jobs they create stay in the US, the raw materials they use in their products will also be domestically sourced. It's a win-win for American workers.
7. The Suburbs – Arcade Fire. Can’t stop listening to this album since it came out. Start to finish it’s PACKED with killer tunes.
Sleep well Tony !!
Bible Doctrines I
There’s nothing to writing. All you do is sit down at a typewriter and open a vein. ~Walter Wellesley “Red” Smith
with the back of a serving spoon
The recent wave of deaths of animals around the world - of fish, birds and, as a new story at today's Anomalist reveals, hundreds of cattle - has generated a wealth of theories for the deaths that range from perfectly natural "die-offs" to a coming apocalypse of Biblical proportions, and just about anything and everything in between.
Bring salvation, bring Your Kingdom
There is only a few seconds of drama tonight and it’s completely Conda-less! I know, I was shocked, too! Let’s follow all our friends home and spy on their progress, shall we?
my girl.Just got up and i will be fixing some coffee and breakfast.it's the most important
The Taj Mahal, Agra, India
Your paragraphs can be as long or as short as you like. Here is my first paragraph:
Wires climb with secrets, carry light and carry words,
Lowdown
April 15, 2012 © EU and US all rights reserved. Permission to use this report in its entirety is granted under the condition it is linked back to its original source at WhatDoesItMean.Com. Freebase content licensed under CC-BY and GFDL.
For the Perth Festival, the company brought out Henry V and The Winter's Tale, which are playing in repertoire. I wonder in retrospect if I made a mistake only choosing to see the latter; it is certainly the lesser play. The evening passed painlessly enough, and there are certainly things to admire, but I was curiously unengaged for most of it. It felt as if I were witnessing all the appearance of theatre with not much of the substance.
I don’t even want to mention how sinking the hotel in the first place is unnecessary when Zero had already settled everything. Why didn’t Cornelia notice that and stop the unnecessary destruction of the hotel ? Oh why because she couldn’t figure out to deploy some communication guy to follow Zero and update on Zero’s situations when Zero proposed his idea.
Begin in Dashboard/Add New Post screen.
I love a good road trip. I love travelling, period; and although extremely long drives are not my favorite, enjoying the scenery of wherever I am is always an adventure. Driving along I-90 through the State of New York in late March can be anything but a colorful experience. The long, straight road connecting Western and Central NY stretches primarily through rural farmlands and endless forests of leafless grey timber. Short, tall, dense or sparse, these seemingly barren trees stand in the cool, cold air awaiting something. More snow perhaps, warmer temperatures, a soaking rain? They do not know what is coming their way, but there they stand…waiting…ready.
Inside the Beltway: Polls don’t hold strong promise for Santorum TENNESSEE: ET Dems rally, predict comeback Obama: Women not ‘interest group’ Pink Slime. Jamie Oliver Food Revolution Jamie Oliver – Chicken Nuggets Experiment (2010-03-26) What’s in a Filet of Fish Sandwich at McDonald’s? Woman Finds Fried Chicken Head In Her McDonald’s Nuggets! Funny Gross Accident!
One of the cases was during the riots in Gothenburg in 2009, where it was set fire to several cars. The rebellion started after police threw two immigrant youths from an occupied premises in the city.
+ Wear sunscreen (oops sorry Trav!)
While al-Nour is allied with Freedom and Justice, the alliance is not without its friction. Al-Nour could be classified as being to the right of the Muslim Brotherhood, especially when it comes to Islam and sharia. Many of them are worried about being absorbed into the Brotherhood, especially since their leader Hazem Abu Ismail was disqualified from running for president by the junta and have now endorsed former Muslim Brotherhood member Abdel Moneim Abol Fotouh for the presidency rather than the Brotherhhood's official candidate, Mohammed Mursi.
What I tried to say!
On that day, the very beginning of summer ,Tango, they prayed for driving away evil spirit and celebrated for especially boys' soundness.
You were a blessing during the planning process. I know how hard you worked to give us everything we wanted within budget, and you delivered more than I could have expected. You really understood who we were, what we wanted and brought our vision to life and embellished it with your own flair without overpowering our ideas. We really appreciate you making our unconventional ideas (like cheesecake!) work for the wedding, and all your vendor recommendations were wonderful!
Coach driving isn’t a job, it’s a lifestyle. It was back then anyway.
Genre: Hardcore/Punk
I specifically asked weeks ago if there was anything I should work on to prep for the grading and makawari conditioning was not mentioned. It really isn't a big deal, but it really is if that makes sense. Eleven days is not a lot of time to condition at all, much less to plan board breaks that are fluid and "logical." I almost feel like I'm being set up to come up short, which isn't cool. Every day there seems to be a new surprise about what will be part of the grading. Last week it was the long line of senior dans that will be lined up for kumite near the end of the test. Honestly, it was beginning to feel more like a hazing instead of a grading. Isn't preparing for a new level supposed to be something that is enjoyed and looked forward to, not something that is dreaded?
The National Zoo is a really great zoo. It is not the biggest or the fanciest, but it has a wide range of animals and interesting little side trails to explore. One of the biggest problems is that it is set on the side of a hill, making the return trek to the top a little exhausting (especially with strollers!) so make sure you plan accordingly. Also, there are maps posted throughout the zoo, but if you want one of your own you will have to pay for it. Instead, I recommend going to the website and printing one off before you go!
The remaining 14 birds are doing really well though. They are loving all the scraps we feed them and have been learning to brave the snow and ice in their outdoor run. I've been pretty impressed with how they've been doing with the cold temperatures - we've had night temperatures down almost to zero degrees (and that's in Fahrenheit - so well below freezing!). Keep in mind their coop isn't insulated, and even when we close their door to the outside run there are obvious gaps in several places in the old, thin plywood walls.
Throw your hair up to show off the jewelry, and not let the ensemble get too busy or forced looking.
Back to reality. I hope that what I felt with Alex was real. That it wasn't the keys or the bridge enhancing our enjoyment of one another's company but an honest to goodness spark. One can never be to sure, especially with ketchup. The tricky thing about dating is that no matter how much you like someone, no matter how many butterflies erupt in your stomach when you see them, no matter how much you really want it to work, it's not up to you; they need to feel it as well. As I'm somewhat of a control freak (I have planned all my dates for the entire summer after all) I'm used to knowing where I stand in the moment and what the next step will be. It's something I'm trying to change and I'm getting better. Step by step, key by key, I'm trying to sit back and enjoy. Even if it brings me to a broken lock, it will have been worth seeing the view.
touch me lightly and burrow deep
I've been afraid to go downstairs ever since the work started -- even though we really needed to do several loads of wash over the past weekend. Hubby has been happily throwing out things I'd stored down in the basement (and forgotten) and I didn't want to be reminded of those things that were now trash, just in case a mad desire to repossess them overtook me.
My bitterness is real
Those Beach Boy songs made sun and the beach sound very appealing!!
I Lost My Gal from Memphis - Evans
Minds like
I love these pictures. I got them from an antique store. They aren't needlepoint but some embroidery technique.
New Book Reviews have just been Posted!
It was awful. So poorly written it was something that, had it been aimed at younger readers, I would not have read it to my boys. There were paragraphs of seven sentences that if she had only added a couple commas, better pronouns and a couple of "ands" it should have been one sentence. That was just the sentence structure, the storyline was no better. I kept reading and thinking maybe the story would outshine the poor writing. Nope, didn't happen. At about page 50 I flipped to the back to read the bio on the author, convinced she couldn't be that thoroughly involved with horses from how she wrote; a rider jumps on a horse and does flying changes no problem after never having done them before, she doesn't know how to wrap a polo wrap or have the training pyramid memorized (oh and she got her fantastic warmblood from a rescue!) but she has been taken on by a top trainer as a working student rider. Imagine my surprise when I discovered the writer was actually a trainer and judge.
Mix eggs with 3 cups of warm water, add salt, sugar and baking soda, add flour and whip so that the dough is uniform, with no lumps. Dilute acid in a cup of water, add to prepared dough, mix and start making blini immediately.
Price : £9.00 plus postage
And, if Hillary should prevail in this contest, may you find it in your
The asterisk above is actually a numeral one in Dear Genius but I can't do footnote numbering in Blogger so used an asterisk instead. That asterisk corresponds to a note at the bottom of the page that says
There are only private homes here.
*A rolling pin wrapped in rubber bands
Lesson One: "B" seaters get the armrests!
Every renters and retailers have to be clear concerning the agreement these people draft before they take this particular arrangement. No Deposit Home has pros and cons with regard to both sides. Sellers who have currently obtained a home will have respite from having to pay Two home loans at the same time, and in a pokey housing marketplace with a lot of homes for sale, this can be their finest choice. Customers who cannot nevertheless purchase a home could possibly acquire one faster.
Still I hear the complaints from parents that their kids don’t want to come to church and don’t want to know God. They tell me that they don’t know how to overcome all the “science that disproves the Bible”. I hear about kids having sex at younger ages and doing drugs and drinking in their teens. Parents are frazzled.
'No wait!' 'ummmm' 'No really, what else was I learning?'
I feel these resources could be used much more effectively. By examining my own thoughts, experiences and feelings about being on welfare, as well as the thoughts, feelings and experiences of other women in my position, I realized that here exists a dire need for our own voice as poor mothers to be inserted into this system that so profoundly affects our lives.
G&M (ditto): The lunch is subsidized by the government and the price depends on family income. The highest rate is 80 euros a month (approximately $110.00 Canadian).
Mendocino Imperial Lager
Get in touch with Sherrifs Rescue
So whether you are early or late--it will still turn out okay.
I have started a secret countdown until he goes. Every morning I wake up and I say to myself, “Only four more Mondays left.” I know it sounds terrible. I must sound like a horrible person. But I cannot tell you the amount of stress I have been under since he moved in. My gray hair count has multiplied tenfold. As a 31 year-old, I am not equipped to raise a teenager with drug-addiction, a criminal record, Reactive Attachment Disorder, and no history of a proper raising. The situation isn’t good for me, it isn’t good for my marriage, it isn’t good for my family, and it certainly isn’t good for Jimmy. We send him away knowing everyone will be served by it. It feels like a looming vacation. I don’t think I would look forward to a trip to Hawaii more at this point.
Self-defense is called terrorism. When the masses understand us, the British divide and conquer card is trumped.
Raven is on a suicide mission. Jex is a biomech on a mission to save humanity. They discover their mutual passion to destroy the enemy isn’t their only desire.
This is precisely what is required of people who really want to find themselves. Because the way we lose ourselves is by turning away from realities that seemed too painful to bear as we grew up: people who insisted we abandon our feelings, our sense of right and wrong, our talents, our opinions, our most heartfelt goals, our likes and dislikes, our hopes for unconditional love.
With that he gave Murgatroyd some advice. ”This man can give more…the routine wasn’t as big as his talents. This guy can be a great dancer.” I agree.
If you separate the goals into positive (goals that occur in positive circumstances (a, c, e)) and negative (goals that occur in negative circumstances (b,d,f)) this provides some interesting subsets. The following players only score their goals in positive circumstances:
Or that Ethel Merman did a PSA to promote the use of ZIP?
constitutional order is not just a crime
the poster tag line is killer.
A HUGE thank-you goes out to you! Let's celebrate one year together, shall we? I am so grateful that you chose to stick around!
They can't believe it, he has single handedly got a draw against France!!
We did some shopping after vising the harbor, and stopped to have a beer or two (or three, we're on vacation, who's counting?) in the sun. We're now pleasently sun burned and tipsy enough not to feel it. I've determined that after this blogging siesta it's time for gelato before doing it all over again....
36. Video Arcade Top 10
AU: The main issue is the people versus the system, and that the former gets more coverage. Obviously, the people related issues are a structural issue, in the sense of issues of power and in service delivery; i.e. people who either lack competence or integrity or both. I am not minimising the people related problems, but to me what is more interesting are the structural issues. If you look at the system as a whole, it does not have the capability to deliver, so it is a system reform that is required as opposed to a change in people only. The second problem is that it is the symptoms which are reported rather than the root cause.
2 heaping tablespoons rosemary tufts
Xuan Zhou Street Angel
So this week’s post finds me sitting in my comfy chair tired as all get out. This past Sunday I traveled to Bristol Motor Speedway for the Food City 500 Sprint Cup Race. This as you may remember from one of my previous posts is one of my favorite past times besides reading. The race was just wonderful and the entire weekend was absolutely beautiful.
After it was over, the warden came around and asked each of us how we felt about the situation. Mind you, as nice as she is, she can be a bit intimidating at times, and most people were in the habit of telling her what they thought she wanted to hear. I’m not like that. I keep it real. I told her that I was very disappointed in her leadership, that the scandal had seriously damaged morale and that I would have a hard time trusting her in the future.
M7 - High: Paddle ball on the beach.
So, what really impressed me, was the way she used the q-tips to give her image a polka-dotted background using all of the colors from her image! I think it looks pretty darn neat! Kind of makes you think....
Back on the road we drove north on University Avenue towards HWY 101 and Menlo Park...
Spend your time investing yourself into others and their careers.
Tulips, peonies, and dandylions. The peonies are the only thing left from my house's former owner's garden. My taste in gardens and hers were not very similar. Those are the tulips I planted in the first weeks after moving here almost 11 years ago.
Last year on the first of June, Dad and my stepmother moved to an assisted living facility just over an hour from my home. It was an excellent move; instantly they were surrounded by caring staff and new friends. They no longer had to haul laundry up and down the (dangerous) basement steps or negotiate icy sidewalks. No danger of him falling from a ladder again, and spending months in rehab (for a time he forgot his own name). No facing months of isolation because of cold temps and those same icy sidewalks. The facility organizes occasional trips for fishing and, at his request, to Dad's favorite casino, along with more sedate activities like bingo and tea time (I have seen my future and it includes jigsaw puzzles). In addition, it was easier for my siblings and I to visit and for Dad and Kay to "host" us without having to make special preparations.
I'm glad I experimented with this recipe and got such a successful result. Happy new year, and may all you lidless pots find your lids this year!
Just a short distance from Bratislava, we spent a day in Vienna seeing the high points. Vienna is incredibly clean and therefore considered very pretty.
I’m not going to explain what HanaDan is about because most of you have probably already seen it, or heard about it given the ungodly amount of promotion, attention and adoration it’s received in the past couple of years. I would seriously recommend it. Even if you don’t care about all that romance crap, it’s still pretty hilarious, given that our protagonists are a rich, violent, psychotic idiot and a poor, clumsy, unfortunate ‘weed’ (Makino’s first name, Tsukushi either means ‘tough weed’ or refers to one – meaning she can grow anywhere and endure anything). It has a fantastic cast, all of whom share a rare sort of chemistry that makes even the far-fetched plot points work somehow.
a mind of solitude
Put clothes on.
Disturbed, I tried to explain that among the many kinds of beers made by hundreds of local breweries all over Japan, of course there were hits and misses. Most of Ise Kadoya's stuff, I said, was actually pretty good. And there is good stuff all over the country.
The White House has started a great new program called "Advise the Advisor," where a member of the President’s senior staff posts a short video on issues being considered by the White House. In turn, the public gets an opportunity to post advice, feedback and opinions about key issues (provided your post is 2500 words or less).
Anyway, Walker's has been around for years and continues to be a favorite! Collin had the soft shell crab special, and I enjoyed the veal with crabmeat and risotto. Oh, and we couldn't go without getting the delicious tamales for appetizer. YUM is all I have to say :) If you're ever in Jackson, you must go!
As I type this I realize I’m assuming the “weekly” in this study refers to Sunday morning, or whatever day your church worships together. My brief hunt for clarification on the Barna site was unfruitful. Nonetheless, I’m interested in knowing where you tend to experience God the most, and, if you’re willing, how often do you feel a close connection to Jesus in that setting? What role should church play in aiding this intimacy?
These sessions will take place on Wednesday 3rd and Thursday 4th August 2011 at Earls Court and will only take about 90 minutes. You will only be required to participate one of the sessions.”
I like to do the brine the day before and refrigerate the meat overnight.
We walked across campus together, chatting about the weather, classes, my dog—safe subjects. As we drew nearer my office, I was still wondering how I might be able to salvage what was left of this uncomfortable situation and transform it into a teachable moment. While I rarely if ever call attention to my blindness, I try whenever possible to educate my students about how best they can be of service to someone with a disability when the need arises.
Well, I see Terrell has read the Suge Knight handbook on conflict resolution. Terrell's lawyer says they will fight the charges and prove his innocence.
I thought I would share the card anyway since its done and my eldest says I should embrace my off days too (which is proof positive of her affinity for fortune cookies).
Cloth Diapering
You won't see us on the T.V.
I plan on (hopefully) having all the kitchen stuff, books, breakables, clothes, bathroom crap, linens and towels, etc moved so all that will be moved on that final day will be furniture. There's enough of that to fill the 6'x12' trailer, I am sure!
All these events cause Catalina to lose the will to live, and she tries to commit suicide but does not find the courage to pull through, so she decides to seek revenge and kill Yésica for betraying her by inviting Yésica to a café and calling the hired killers, giving them the directions that Yésica is dressed a certain way and sitting at a table by herself reading a book. The killers do their job and kill the girl by shooting her three times in the back, later to be shown that the girl killed is Catalina, who had a change of mind; that instead of killing Yésica, she decided to plot her own assassination instead by disguising herself as Yésica. Before getting killed, Catalina wrote in the book she was holding the line which gave the series its title, "It's a lie - without breasts
Bryan took over as High Point's brewer in 2008, when Paul Scarmazzo retired after a stroke. He quickly put his own stamp on the Ramstein wheat and lager beers, including the brewery's well-received seasonals. Ramstein Oktoberfest and Maibock earned top ratings by BeerAdvocate and RateBeer during his tenure.
N-Nutrients- Do you like carbs, fats, or proteins the most? DUH! Carbs!
It should be worthy of a bookmark, from the looks of early indicators.
Globe jumps: 10
_ Transcribing various correspondence, such as letters concerning families and property. Transcribing could take the form of hand writing files so that another volunteer could type them or typing them directly from the original format.
I TAKE WHAT THE MARKETS GIVE ME AND AM GRATEFUL FOR THESE GIFTS
Have you ever tried really hard to lose weight? Or quit some food that you don't want to eat anymore? It's hard. And remember how awful you feel when you grab one and stuff it down? This feels way worse. Remember that just because he falls does not mean that he isn't still moving in the right general direction. If he remains committed to breaking the addiction, then forgive him. And encourage him to talk to an accountability partner about it.
“Behold the man from the highest who secures the covenant”
It's a beer of a kind that get brewed across the globe: a mainstream product so lacking in character you forget you're drinking it.
Retail investor sentiment according to the weekly AAII improved slightly along with the recovering stock market. The bullish grew slightly to 38.3% (from 37.5% last week) and the bears fell from 36% to 30% bringing the bull ratio up to 56%. This is normal behavior but of course, as contrarians, we’d prefer to see a bit more skepticism to cement the floor.
(6) According to the Sunday Times “the circuit court will also have the power to rule on rent arrears”. Again this is not clear – perhaps tenants will be entitled to reduce their rents paid pending an outcome of the circuit court.
Yet, Guerrero acknowledged that times were changing. With advances in technology and shifting racial relations, media has to change as well in order to appeal to the demographics. The imbalance of social powers among the different races in the US is gradually diminishing, and race relations are no longer a problem.
I split some hostas this year... first time ever! I read once that hostas are the one perennial that you do not have to actually divide to keep them healthy and looking good. I dug up little "chunks" of my favorite hosta, June, to add along the pump house... it faces north.
5. Ensure the stakes are high.
Inside are two FDCs and three used stamps:
Let me ask you- out of that six thousand one hundred and fifty six readers, how many of those writers and aspiring writers write spot on? Write well? No misspellings, no grammatical errors?
Dudu Pukwana grew up studying piano in his family, but in 1956 he switched to alto sax after meeting tenor sax player Nick Moyake. In 1962, he won first prize at the Johannesburg Jazz Festival with Moyake's Jazz Giants (1962 Gallo/Teal). Chris McGregor then invited him to join the pioneering Blue Notes sextet where he played along with Mongezi Feza, Nikele Moyake, Johnny Dyani and Louis Moholo. Although The Blue Notes are often considered McGregor's group, Pukwana was initially the principal composer and all the group members had pivotal roles.
As I approach the intersection and see the jeeps docked around and within the intersection, I feel my blood boil. I feel rage (at 6am). In a flash I imagine myself driving a Humvee carelessly through. Or maybe don my own vigilante gear and teach everyone the Rule of Law. But then the heat eventually yields to compassion; if I am having a tough time making ends meet with my salary and the bills that don’t pay themselves, I am certain that they are having an even more difficult time. I then look into their eyes from behind my tinted glass and see not malice, but a desperate yet patient determination that they’re just doing what they have to do — blaring horns and battering curses be damned.
DURATION OF COURSE:
But back to this last weekend-being that there are no coincidences in life but all things are joined together, It then makes sense that the day before I saw the snake in my garden, Saturday, we’d visited a little shop and Jeff bought me a dragon. I sat with the dragon and he spoke to me of his abilities. He said his direction was the South, element= Fire, and that he helped with manifesting your highest potential. He has keen intellect and sports great passion and tenacity and much more. The creativity that is sparked from dragon along with the inner dimensions associated with snake are leading me into much more complex cycles of growth.
On the last note:
Of course, there are other human superheroes, but nothing points to any super-special qualities about their meal choices. Scientific genius David Banner is a normal guy who probably eats like one, but The Hulk not eat when angry and smash things. (I have an inverse reaction: when I don't eat, I get angry and turn into the Incredible Sulk.)
But if Albert makes off, it won’t be for lack of telling.
Do you usually give something up for Lent? What are you giving up this year?
Anyway … thanks bunches to all my guildies for the help and support getting these things done. You’re all awesome!
The expected parental delivery
So what have I arrived with? Well, let’s looks at what I have:
Now began what seemed like an endless time of waiting. Waiting for a very short general information about the company that was recruiting new employees this day. Then an even longer time of waiting began for my name to be called so that a short interview could take place. When that finally happened I was more than happy to leave the whole thing behind and travel back to the real world.
Why don’t we take a peek and catch up together.
Regardless, I find all sorts of wacky stuff on the web and well, I like to spring it on unsuspecting blog readers. Did I just say that out loud?
The SA police services are scum really.
Ab initio language provision is now widely offered at UK universities both for students following language degree programmes and those on language modules. The following is a selection of research publications, reports and conference papers which include discussion of the nature of provision, learning outcomes and motivational issues (it’s not an exhaustive list).
Ms. Navarro began by expressing the somewhat wistful hope that as much discussion would be spent on “positive youth activities,” closing the academic achievement gap, and other programs policies that would reduce the “overrepresentation of youth of color” in the juvenile system. She acknowledged that she was initially attracted to the curfew proposal, but then thought about herself “not as mother but as a legislator,” ultimately deciding alternatives hadn’t been tried enough:
Thank you, from the bottom of my heart, for allowing God to use each of you. You can't possibly understand how much you have touched the hearts of each person in my family. If I don't tell you individually, know that your kindness does not go un-noticed. I see it. but most importantly, God sees it. and He smiles. :)
And at last but a few shreds left on the staffs (and all in silence),
Eddie meets a girl who is perfectly at ease in the darkness, who appears and disappears at will and seems very interested in Eddie's home life and in Uncle Wilf in particular.
There were also some harp players. Harpists? I think it'd be neat to play a harp, to me it looks like a cross between a guitar and a piano.
Rather than the guy that is being nice to her and doing everything nice for her that she can just take whatever she wants. So how do you misinterpret things she says?
With AA23 taking a stronghold of the left hand side, I feel its time Bendtner gets his run out on the right hand side.
After Britten and Freeman explain this to Captain Harper, she tells them that an FBI agent who has been on the Gemini Killer case since its beginning will be flying in to join the investigation. We then meet the FBI agent, Elizabeth Santoro, on the phone with her ex-husband arguing about custody of their daughter. She tells Britten that she has been in Portland writing a book on the case, and that one detail of the murders they didn't make public was that the killer always left a two dollar bill in the victims hand. Since Britten's victim didn't have one, they definitely have a copycat killer. Remembering his dream, Britten asks her what Portland is like, and Santoro tells him it always rains, like London with hippies.
She ended the night with a kiss on the cheek. I am not even joking when Taleah said (after Scott jokinly told her that there was no kissing boys), "I am going to put lip gloss on and kiss him on the lips!" I couldn't believe it and I have no idea where she heard that. I know she was just saying it to get a rise out of us (she is like her dad). When it came down to it, she was a little shy about giving him a kiss on the cheek. It was so cute.
Your blog is public
Indeed.
I don't really care about longevity of life. I care more about quality of life. And I feel good, and happy, and I'll be checking my numbers again in another few months to see where they stand.
Take me down like I’m a domino
As numbers grew and tensions rose, there were reports of disruption along the route, with police employing their batons. Arrests were reported on the Williamsburg Bridge and in Midtown.
I got turned onto Tweetdeck and have been utilizing it with listings posted to the shop. Love it! and it has freed me up to start tracking down twits to follow on twitter. I made sure to follow a couple of the airlines just to see the discounted fares. Not that I get to hop on a plane whenever - I can daydream about the possibility.
I have heard some of their music before, but today at work I started listening a bit more. Their album names are funny, to say the least (sometimes you just really have to understand the German, of course). Then I was listening to their song called “Mai Khao Djai”. As German is not my native language, I first tried to hear whether they were just singing German words, maybe some “Mundart” (local dialect), but I couldn’t make heads or tails of it.
smiles and slightly inebriated kisses
Still feeling tired after a walk around tbp. Laura Mercier still OOS, sian.
WE WELCOME YOUR COMMENTS.
A couple of times, I thought of leaving because I was ashamed to be there. After all, I have a job. Yes, it is part-time and does not provide all the income I need – not all I want, mind you, just what I need to survive. But, I have a job. I think one-third of us in the room have jobs, but those jobs aren't providing what we need to adequately feed ourselves and our families. I also have a home. It is falling apart faster than I can repair it, and I can’t heat it adequately, but I’m not living in shelters, or worse (and like a few people in the room), trying to survive out on the streets. How could I sit there, waiting for my number to be called to fill a shopping cart, when so many others sitting around me have it so much worse? I felt like a whiny-ass fraud. But I stayed. I needed the food the church was giving out more than I needed my dignity at that point.
Refreshed by a good night's sleep and chocolate truffles delivered to my room on a pretty plate at bedtime, our next school was Stanwell School just around the corner in Penarth, where I spoke to two groups of Year 7 and a group of Year 12 creative writing students in their very impressive new lecture theatre.
Anne Enright describes her writing process as 'writing sentences.' I believe what she means is that the writing comes first, the editing and worrying about how/what you're saying come second. How would you describe your writing process: do you have to fight hard from the coalescing of an idea to the final cut?
But most importantly you didn’t bother
I made this card for last week's sketch challenge over Splitcoast stampers. I used the SAB goodies. I love the Fresh Vintage collection!
It's back! I miss doing these and I figure, if nothing else, I at least post something once a week, right? Right! So without further ado, let's get on with Friday! If I end up repeating myself, just ignore me, I'll eventually go away. ::winks::
Add the chili powder and stir it in until the ‘rice’ looks dirty. Let it cook for a few minutes to take on the flavour. Add the garlic, olives, and green onions. Stir well. Preheat the oven broiler.
3. Amazon.com believes it is censorship not to sell certain titles because we believe their message is objectionable.
I do not like myself not posting often or rather posting occasionally.... but I guess it is gonna be so until I get a breather...... Phew!!!!
So my question is: how do you make that into a movie, where you can’t just read everything the character is thinking?
If you want to complete NaNo fast, this is the sum you have to do. Fortunately for me (or not, if you look at it from a bank manager's point of view), I've got very few hours at work at the moment - only 9 a week - and few other obligations that couldn't be put down for a week. Assuming I wanted to sleep 8 hours a night (in the end, I pulled an all-nighter on the Sunday night to enable me to finish in time), 60 hours' writing time leaves me with 43 hours in the week for doing everything else.
"I bet it starts raining and doesn't stop on the first day back to school just because I'll have to walk around in it all day."
Certain songs speak to me. I want to own them. This can only happen through perpetual play. I cannot help this habit. If I like something, and I have the power to bring joy into my little world, how can I resist?
So with the W02, as speed increases and the CofP moves forwards. Now the corner entry oversteer create a danger of high speed spins, the team need to calm the chassis down a little. So when the wing stalls, the CofP moves rearwards and gives the drivers more confidence with a little understeer. In Michaels case his naturally aggressive turn in is tolerated and as we’ve seen Rosberg can cope with understeer. So both drivers benefit. This might also save the tyres from slip in high speed turns, which could be detrimental to the tyres grip.
Bizarrely, the most highly-attenuated of the Stouts is Milk Stout. I thought that was supposed to be sweet? You have to wonder how much - if any - lactose it contained with an FG as low as 1013.6º. Maybe, like the many oatmeal Stouts contained bugger all oats, there was a token amount of lactose thrown in to justify the name.
Watch out for traffic,
As a child, I was a Brownie and then a Junior Girl Scout. My mother was a troop leader. How that happened, I will never know. I remember 5 specific things about my time as a Girl Scout:
Which features cyborgs having sex (-9)
So, if you can read the post, good for you. If you can’t, below is the copy-paste of the post named Happy Easter and How to write a novel in 100 days or less. The first version got eaten by the cyber bunnies before the unknowing author realized.
It so happened that a year or so ago my glance fell on a copy of “Where Eagles Dare” by Alistair McLean, and the idea popped into my head to combine my two favourite kinds of books. So I set out to write an Alistair McLean inspired science fiction war thriller. I even named the first chapter “Where Angels Fear” as a tribute to McLean.
Cooking, laundry, diapering, cleaning, carpool... the list goes on.
Third up were Japan-Thai nutbags, LOW FAT. Made up of two Japanese and two Thai, Low Fat play that brand of insane hardcore punk you just can’t sit still through.
24 hours you'll never forget -- JUNE 27th-28th, 2009 -- 9 am - 9 am
Because what this show so sorely needed was another character whose role basically comes down to ‘provide fanservice’. She’s basically half-naked at home nearly all the time. For no fucking reason. Well, I mean a reason other than providing eye-candy for the lonely male subset of the audience. I’d claim that the writers are probably misogynistic and so terrible that they are unable to write a female in any believable fashion, instead opting to objectify them endlessly, but that would be unfair, because they are unable to write period.
Icarus (15) – Reached the highest point in the world
I got to dyeing in a roundabout way. I am a lifelong quilter and I began dyeing my own fabrics to use in my quilts. From there, I expanded into dyeing: dyeing yards to use in weaving, batik dyeing and finally a curiosity about dyes themselves.
Sweet Teddi. It will be four years this coming Saturday since I held our little China bird for the very first time--one of the best May days of my life! Oh that the Lord would see fit to bestow upon me the honor and privilege of being Teddi's mama, He is good. Adoption is His heart, and my how it has blessed our nest. Theadora, you are a gift straight from your Heavenly Father's heart!
London is one of the world's centres of Arab journalism and political activism. The failure of left and right, the establishment and its opposition, to mount principled arguments against clerical reaction has had global ramifications. Ideas minted in Britain – the notion that it is bigoted to oppose bigotry; "Islamophobic" to oppose clerics whose first desire is to oppress Muslims – swirl out through the press and the net to lands where they can do real harm.
Herx is claiming sex discrimination and disabilities discrimination under the Americans with Disabilities Act and requesting lost wages, punitive damages, attorney’s fees, and compensation for her mental anguish and emotional distress.
I'll admit, I don't always buy into some of the concepts Erik tosses around because he's not the "Beer Geek" of the group... I am. However, over the last year or so we've seen the line between "Beer Geek" and "Beer Snob" blur to the point that the two are dangerously close to becoming one and the same. The last thing the craft beer industry needs is a bunch of elitist snobs turning beer it into something it's not. Making it less accessible to Jack and Jill Sixpack is not the goal here.
Except for that part where the Coyotes will leave Phoenix for Quebec City…
i guess im now on a journey to rebuild my fitness and i have to be patient for it to return. charlie's boundless energy provides great inspiration in that regard.
it is 7:15 Thursday morning.. Little Bean is still sleeping.. She sacked out a bit before 7 last night...and I followed shortly after that.. I think we are both catching up on our sleep.
So, what course should be taken? As a principle, those people who are most affected by the decision should have the final say. (In many cases this would be the smallest group.) Otherwise, such democracy is actually a form of dictatorship. In this example, then, unless the local community’s interests are fully satisfied and their concerns fully addressed, they should be able to veto the dam, or, if this option is not given to them, to act in such a way that they prevent its construction.
As a verb, project means to extend outwards beyond something else. A dream remains a dream until it is projected into reality.
The object of section 3 of Act No. 671 in requiring the President to report “as soon as practicable upon the convening of the Congress of the Philippines all rules and regulations promulgated by him under the powers therein granted” is to inform the Congress of the contents of said rules and regulations so that the latter may modify or repeal them if it sees fit to do so, inasmuch as, according to section 4 of the same Act, “the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder shall be in force and effect until the Congress shall otherwise provide.” And although said section 3 does not specify whether in regular or special session, it is evident that it refers to the next regular and not to the special session of the Congress, because as a rule a special session is called to consider only specific matters submitted by the President to Congress for consideration, and it would be useless to submit such report to the Congress in special session if the latter can not either modify or repeal such rules and regulations; and besides, it is to be presumed that it was the intention of the National Assembly in enacting section 3 of Commonwealth Act No. 671 to require the submission of a report to the next regular session of the Assembly or Congress, as provided in section 4 Commonwealth Act No. 600, as amended by Commonwealth Act No. 620, which required a similar report, for there was absolutely no plausible reason to provide otherwise.
When I was growing up, my brother and I were the only kids on either side of the family. I mostly hung out with my grandparents and aunts who were 40 years older than I. I often enjoy the company of those older than I, and sometimes more than the company of my peers. But there’s something about sitting in a waiting room and knowing I have this disease, this problem that is only supposed to be THEIR problem, this thing that is not supposed to affect me until I also need a cane or a walker. I was scared and angry.
Ally is quick on her feet, confident and is ready to show “the man” a thing or two. Her success never goes to her head. Deep down she’s a blue collar girl from a manufacturing town fighting for justice amidst all the nut-jobs and crack-pots she meets along the way.
First thing is don’t panic. It’s the very worst thing you can do. If you’d panic them we will talk about that here in a minute. When you completely felt out and have emotional breakdowns, it only confirms their decision to break up and it pushes them further away.
(Of course, I might be wrong too on my theory of the three tiers, it is all up for discussion, and in realism no one really knows the truth except Christ who IS truth)
Above, when man meets demon. Just think, this could be the fate that awaits a good number of us in the afterlife if we don’t start getting our act together.
When I looked in the rearview, my eyes were bloodshot. I had not – to my knowledge – engaged in any kind of risky behavior that would have cause my eyes to look swollen and red. The stop-and-go of the H1 was like a lullaby. I just wanted to go to sleep.
But I think the real inspiration came when I started playing musical instruments. Piano was the first. Unfortunately during my lessons I was tutored by a drugged up old granny with scarecrow-like fingers and she constantly smelt of a wet carpet that had a bunch of livestock living on it.
Hello! Sean is doing OK still at his new digs. He thoroughly enjoyed watching VCU take down the Jayhawks on Sunday. I really shouldn't reprint Matthew's text about the VCU win, but I know it completely captured Sean's thoughts. :) Something about rock, chalk, go something, something... Friday and Saturday were better days than Thursday. He opened his eye and seemed to breathe better. Sunday he didn't open his eye and seemed to rest a lot more. He also was coughing a lot more and the night nurse said his lungs sounded "wet". That is not the greatest news, but breathing treatments seem to help him breathe easier.
Delhi is a chameleon metropolis changing colors at the blink of an eye.
Leviticus 19:19 : Keep it going: Cotton poly blend Tshirt? Not just a sin of style, but god says abomination!
(Fareda faces the king.)
Matt said in ‘The Sun’ that Whitney moved to Michael’s ranch to stay there. He knew that his former boss dreamed of marrying the female singer.
Police had created an online profile of a 14-year-old girl that included photographs of Nelson as a teenager.
"Will." The doll chuckled. "Call me Will. I can't bring her to you, but I can take you to her. You've been trained as well as possible here in Salem, but you're not world class. There's still so much to do! You can bring honor to your people and to your country with your talents. Dr. Nine will be most pleased with how far you've come and most interested in where you need to go." He clapped his hands, the sound sharp in the small, dusty room. "We're wasting time here. Tell them the deal."
Of age, to rob the lover's heart of ease;
CER0
Also WARNING: Don’t point binoculars at the sun or anywhere NEAR the sun in the daytime! Be real careful and deliberate. One sweep over the sun could injure you permanently. And whatever you do, DO NOT LET KIDS try this with binoculars for the same reason. The sun is not playing and does not forgive.
So to the following lively U.S. cities -- don’t go changing on our behalf.
Just enter the code DADCARD at checkout.
Social additions are a mixed bag as well. Many games will connect to users’ Twitter or Facebook account to send out automatic updates on the players; progress and achievements are delivered to friends and followers (often with maddening frequency). Search Twitter for “achievement” and you’ll find millions of nearly identical auto-tweets from whatever games are trending at the moment.
And while he still elected not to keep swimming and the two boys soon went back to the trailer to hide out for the remainder of the afternoon, I felt like I had made a small difference.
* We met Beverley Paine, who in Australia is a home ed pioneer and veteran, ideas person and somewhat of a guru, especially in Natural Learning. She has also perfected the art of inspiring and building up people's confidence.
Fools Rush In Where Angels Fear to Tread
Gunisoo: Hey.
If it is the latter, then they are probably on safe ground on Lords reform as there are less than a handful of Lib Dems in Westminster willing to walk away from government on that particular issue - and Nick Clegg is not among them. Europe, however, might be something altogether different.
The phrase is conventionally attributed to Sir Isaac Newton in a letter to Robert Hooke in 1676 -
Evilgrade takes the advantage of various applications because most of these verify neither the update contents nor the master update server. Basically, in this type of attack, the attacker seeks to modify the DNS traffic of the victim and return them to some other ip address controlled by the attacker.
Top with some of the filling. Place the chocolate sponge layer next.
It came down to Jaleel White and Gavin, but when all was said and done– Gavin was sent packing. He ended the show by saying, “It’s been amazing,” and “My family got to have a great time. We reunited in a lot of ways” through his participation on the show.
Of course there's no guarantee that transit-riding voters will elect pro-transit representatives, as we see from people like Ruben Diaz and Hakeem Jeffries. But I think that if the Putnam Line had never been shut down - and if at least one of the Thruway, Saw Mill River or Sprain Brook highways hadn't been built - Brodsky would have been a bit less likely to oppose congestion pricing. There's no certainty there, just statistical likelihood, but that's why we have to keep working to build transit riding constituencies in the suburbs and all over the state.
In 2002, British police initiated a crackdown on supporters of Osama bin Laden's terror network in Leicester. A police swoop on predominantly Muslim areas of the city led to the arrest of eight Islamic jihadists, who were accused of belonging to al-Qaeda and conspiring to raise money to fund terrorism.
The Roman Catholic Church has existed for 2,000 years plus, it’s seen all forms of corruption, financial, sexual, you name it. But throughout it all, one thing has remained inviolate, because of the protection of the Holy Spirit, and that is the deposit of faith.
He lived his later years in the city in a home near Broadway and Worth Street, before finally retiring back to the family home in Flushing. He died in 1861 and you can conceivably still go visit him; he's buried at the Lawrence family burying ground at 216th Street and 42nd Avenue in Bayside, Queens.
By expanding the title in 2010 to the i, the Independent effectively changed their method of output for news. They understood that one publication is still aimed at multiple audiences. By expanding the brand, it allowed them to focus each publication on their two most significant audiences – successfully transferring the biggest advantage of online news outlets into a printed format.
I even got to rearrange the front room after the rug was cleaned.
And that nest in the sycamore tree
Throughout the world, different seasoning and spices are used to augment the flavor of fried chicken. Because of the versatility of fried chicken, it is not uncommon to flavor the chicken’s crisp exterior with a variety of spices ranging from spicy to savory. Depending on regional market ubiquity, local spice variations may be labeled as distinct from traditional Southern U.S. flavors, or may appear on menus without notation. With access to chickens suitable for frying broadening on a global scale with the advent of industrialized poultry farming, many localities have added their own mark on fried chicken, tweaking recipes to suit local preferences.
The Bruce album shows her expressive style to great effect, in well-chosen songs (leaving aside the dreadful "Calypso Blues"). Her accomplished accompanists include guitarist Tony Mottola and pianist Buddy Weed. The sound is good, if with a bit too much reverb.
Northampton, MA ♦ Oasis in Northampton at Smith College offers a combination of the great outdoors and modern indoor facilities! Your child will have an exceptional summer camp experience close to home! Smith is the ideal setting for a traditional camp experience. Outstanding amenities/activities include canoeing, indoor rock climbing, a skate park, 25 acres of grass playing fields, bike trails, a 6-lane swimming pool, an indoor/outdoor track, and an indoor basketball court along with additional air-conditioned indoor space for the arts. Oasis is 8:30am-4:30pm and is for children ages 4-12! Transportation, hot lunch, early drop-off and late-stay are available to help make camp convenient for you! Enroll for 2-8 weeks, they’re flexible!
Not enough for ya? Behold, child abuse in action....
Look at her. She’s sitting on the pine like she’s doing it a favor. Anyways. I was wondering if I should take her out to a nice place. We settled for Thursday night and I want to surprise her. You know, take her out somewhere fancy. I was thinking the dumpster of Jean-Georges. I heard the leftovers from their chef’s tasting menu is just absolutely phenomenal. I’d honestly rather eat dog shit, but she’s too classy for that sort of stuff. That will come later in the relationship if things go smoothly.
Growing up, my ignorance regarding the identity of my birthparents seemed okay. It left me room to imagine. I used to imagine that maybe I would just see her on the street one day, we would cross paths, and I would know she was my birthmom. I imagined her as pretty, but faceless. I can’t remember any particular features I had in my mind when I tried to imagine her. I just thought she was probably sweet and pretty. The non-identifying information reported my mother as being interested in dance as a hobby. I felt connected to her because I loved to dance, too. I even imagined that she went to the University of Illinois (because I was born in Champaign, IL), and I imagined that she might have even been an Illinette. Turns out I was right about where she attended college.
Friday, 17 February 2012. A suicide bomb attack on a market in a Shia Muslim area of north-west Pakistan has killed 26 people and injured at least 50 others, officials say.
And that will make all the difference
Sonic Adventitious 5
He sits…then and there…frustrated.
Crews with members younger than 18-years of age must be accompanied by an adult.
V/A - San Jose Is Ground Zero (Petroleum 1986, comp with A Cruel Hoax, The Social Club, The Kingpins...)
3. Rock and Roll Women
I hate that the OG looks so pretty and so grown up in the picture (self-portrait, natch) at the top of this post.
These three PR firms are only a few of the many PR companies in Florida. Each has a designated type of clientele, but they also serve others in the community when possible. Some focus more on business PR and others put a greater emphasis on non-profit organizations. All of the firms are successful and beneficial to the community and the area in different ways.
Chapter Five also includes a discussion of the bank bailout (TARP) and the stimulus program. Romney agrees that the TARP and stimulus were needed, but criticizes their implementation:
Certainly, VNM gives you an inside track on a fast-growing Asian economy. In 2008, Vietnam grew at a 6.5% clip. Even in recession-ravaged ‘09, the IMF has forecasted 5% growth for the increasingly visible country.
The descent into totalitarianism has landmarks. Any day now, the Supreme Court in London will decide whether the WikiLeaks editor, Julian Assange, is to be extradited to Sweden. Should this final appeal fail, the facilitator of truth-telling on an epic scale, who is charged with no crime, faces solitary confinement and interrogation on ludicrous sex allegations. Thanks to a secret deal between the US and Sweden, he can be “rendered” to the American gulag at any time. In his own country, Australia, prime minister Julia Gillard has conspired with those in Washington she calls her “true mates” to ensure her innocent fellow citizen is fitted for his orange jump suit just in case he should make it home. In February, her government wrote a “WikiLeaks Amendment” to the extradition treaty between Australia and the US that makes it easier for her “mates” to get their hands on him. She has even given them the power of approval over Freedom of Information searches – so that the world outside can be lied to, as is customary.
Yes, that does seem like a good plan, but what seems reasonable, and what I can force myself to do, are two different things. I have no problem reading good novels, but I can't force myself to read bad ones. Depending on how bad they are I may put them down after 5 pages, or maybe 10. The only reason I would finish one was if I had another motive, like it being an important work or something like that.
What did surprise me, however, was the unexpected deflation I felt when I asked the young girl looking after us if the Cascade First Harvest Ale was available yet. Her almost apologetic “No, sorry, not until May 3rd I’m afraid” was received with all the boyish disappointment that used to accompany the realisation that the season’s first Scanlen’s Footy Cards had not yet been delivered to the Milk Bar.
So come out, support the Olathe Rotary Club & Heart to Heart International… and enjoy a fine evening of Wine & Rotary (and food!).
In January 1976, in the state district court for Tulsa County, Oklahoma, Petitioner and Richard Dodson, a codefendant, were tried jointly on charges of murder in the first degree–i.e., a homicide perpetrated in the commission of an armed robbery (felony murder), the underlying felony of armed robbery, and shooting with an intent to kill. Petitioner and Dodson were represented by the same counsel. Petitioner was convicted on all three counts and was sentenced to death on the murder charge, twenty-five years imprisonment on the armed robbery conviction, and twenty years imprisonment on the shooting with intent to kill charge. Dodson was acquitted on the murder charge, but convicted on the other two charges.
Unsurprisingly it seems that it is accidents and ill health that cost businesses, and not a preoccupation with health and safety. The Institution of Occupational Safety and Health says work-related accidents and ill health cost businesses nearly £8 billion a year, with absenteeism, low productivity and legal bills among the ‘financial hits’. The Lofstedt report cites 4.4 million working days lost due to workplace injuries and ‘a massive 22.1 million lost due to work-related ill health during 2010/11.’
In two weeks it will be triathlon-eve. And now I'm all nervous. Ug.
I kept her in her card packaging for two reasons:
Sarah Prichard, counsel for the GMC, said the mistake was made as a nurse helping the surgeon turned her back to get a stitch.
Griffin: 437 runs, 4.3 YPC, 5.9 TD%
I wanted Shimer to improve me. If anything it has done the opposite.
She danced her little heart out and those little wandering eyes looking out for Mummy and Daddy were just adorable.
a) the middle finger of the left hand
However, I recently wanted to make Mac N Cheese with an elbow macaroni. Well I tried the Tinkyada pasta and loved it. I would vote it best gluten free pasta.
DFTD: “Well, we aim to bring the works of Bob Dylan to a section of the populace who have, until now, been unable to appreciate a ‘live’ (index fingers again, Oh God) Dylan performance.”
Every year there’s an enticing array of mooncakes at all the malls around this time – the Mid-Autumn or Lantern Festival. I overheard a tourist at Vivo say, “I sampled them all, now there’s no need to buy any.”
I'm going to talk about this in reverse order, because I'm sometime perverse that way. :)
1957: Vice Principal comes over, looks at Jack’s shotgun, goes to his car and gets his shotgun to show Jack.
You guys are just the best! All the comments, tweets, and sweet emails just blew me away yesterday! Thank you all from the bottom of my heart for all of your amazing encouragement--it means the world to me!:)
So if you don’t have an “ inmigrante” or “ inmigrado” status in Mexico you will need to know the tax implications. The Capital Gain is 30% of the gain. The notary will send the necessary information to a tax accountant to calculate the amount. This information will include the date of your purchase and the value which was declared on your deed when you purchased the property. It will mention deductions such as the acquisitions tax you paid when you bought and the public registry fee and the notary’s fee if you have the proper fiscal receipt for this expense. The realtor’s commission is also deductible, but you will need to provide an official receipt. If you are selling a furnished property I would suggest you allocate a separate value to the furnishings and accessories so they will not be considered part of the Real Property.
My sister has a foot phobia. I don’t mean like a slight aversion to feet. I mean that she is actually afraid of them and actively avoids them in all situations. She wears socks…all the time. I went to the movies with her the other day (it’s the middle of summer) and she quickly threw off her thongs & proceeded to put on some socks. I’ve asked her why she hates them so much…she says she can’t explain, but the sight of feet make her feel sick.
Put all the ingredients in a big bowl and mix together until the dry ingredients are covered in the honey and applesauce.
I fail all the time, like a falling star.
It's bullshit.
The recent arrival of two university friends meant it was time for The Wall, Take II. And this time we really did have to climb. After driving up into the foothills outside Beijing – passing a man leading a camel along the way – we arrived at Mùtiányù, where a large section of the Ming Dynasty wall, complete with 23 watchtowers, snakes along the mountain top. At first we ambled along under the smog-free, sunny sky, passing only a few fellow tourists. Then “climb” became the operative word, with steep inclines and hawkers offering temptingly over-priced chocolate bars at the top of each new height.
By meeting one on one with foreign editors and agents we learn what we cannot learn just from what they publish. It is why we have lunches with editors here, and it is why we meet with editors from all over the world. We learn something about them personally, about their market, their publisher, all things that we could not know otherwise. And it is awesome to meet with editors from Spain, France, Germany, Italy, etc. who have bought one of our books and to hear what their publication plans are and how things are going. And to know if the title will change and if they are using the US cover and if not, to see the cover they designed. Agents want to sell books they love so that other people will find them and love them and when they are translated or sold in the UK or Australia it means more people can find them and love them!
was sweeping
Opals are considered to be able to confer the gift of invisibility on its wearer. To accomplish this, Cunningham says "The gem was wrapped in a fresh bay leaf and carried for this purpose." He also says, "Opals are also worn to bring out inner beauty.
Can’t get enough n I always want more
And Agamemnon dead.
Hello—
Tolerance of me, loyalty, consistency, trustworthiness.
Over the weekend, Adam and I took a little trip to Bed, Bath & Beyond with a gift card in hand. I was looking for a new shower curtain and Adam was looking to get in and out as quickly as possible (I swear, within 30 seconds of us walking through the doors he started asking me if I was done yet). I was hoping to find something for $24.99, when I stumbled across this beauty by Amy Butler for $49.99. Not to worry, I quickly rationalized that I was still saving money, so how could I not buy it?
_______________________________________________________________________
7 x 9 chapbook. 122# heavy cover paper. Hand stamped and printed. Repurposed maps throughout. Printed and bound in an edition of 90.
You don't understand the concept. When you create something anonymously - and this is going to blow your minds - it's not really about you anymore. You're not dancing around behind a false name and playing hide n' seek with the cops, and making everyone wonder who you are. You're just pouring everything you have into one perfect, beautiful, timeless artifact... and walking away. It's done. It belongs to the universe now. Go have a beer and a good private chuckle. A generation who can't break wind without a Facebook update isn't going to understand this, of course. Instead you invented something we never thought possible: Narcissistic Anonymity. I guess that's your gift. Sweet Jesus, please take it back.
For the Whipped Cream Cheese Frosting:
And so I’ve thought through these impediments and potential problems, chipped at them one by one. And every month away from the antipsychotic, able to think and to make plans and follow through on them, I am stronger. More resilient. Better equipped to handle those things. I stretched out the time between appointments as much as possible, and when I saw him I asked him for help, an alternative, a way to get OFF Klonopin and not go bats with anxiety and mania. Prescription one exacerbated my neurological disorder. Prescription two was at base a shinier version of Seroquel.
I'm at bulldog days right now...everything is absolutely incredible! So I'm curious about demographic here: who's reading this? Are you a teenager, a parent, somewhere in between? And what are you hoping to find on my blog? By all means suggest post topics. I'll write what you want to read. Leave me a comment!
I have repeatedly witnessed intelligent, hard-working individuals get mentally checked off the boss’s list of promotable employees because of failure to set expectations and adjust them as needed. Follow-through is viewed as the least you can do. Managing expectations is a job well done.
According to this hypothesis, the holy grail of advertising is now targeting. Technology has provided marketers with the ability to deliver advertising messages targeted to individual consumer profiles and needs. This is typified by web advertising served to us based on a stunning amount of personal information which is collected about us. Soon, the theory goes, cable TV will also be able to find us down to the level of the node that carries our signal and likewise deliver personalized advertising messages. This, according to Mr. Nail and his cohort, has reduced mass marketing to irrelevancy.
Plus I'm sure Colin isn't a bad bloke in real life and probably doesn't wear a black and silver mask.
you know that phrase, "so bad it's good?"
And immediately she fell at his feet and breathed her last, and the young men came in and found her dead, and they carried her out and buried her beside her husband.
Or do you prefer to fly
As we continued on she turned to me and said “I was watching you as you two were stood there and from the way you were standing you looked completely at ease and also completely like a woman.”
I could not go on most of them, because the thrill of speed is not pleasant to me at all. However, I enjoyed the wave pool, the tamer slides and the “Lazy River” that took you all around the park gently floating on an inner tube. There was a funny moment when my inner tube got stuck on a “dead spot”, and would not go anywhere, while my friends got more and more separated from me, and I tried everything; from “rowing” with my hands, to kicking my feet, all to no use. Eventually other tubes got stuck behind me and pushed me away from the “dead spot” so I could find my friends again.
I no longer want anything to do with you Andy XXXXXXXX. I do not want you to contact me through email or instant messenger. Please do not come to my job or anywhere near my place of employment. If you ever contact me again I will file a restraining order against you which will become a matter of public record. I advise you to take this email seriously. I have kept your emails and I have the note you left on my car as evidence. DO NOT CONTACT ME AGAIN.
Arkansas state constitution lists in Article II, Section 24. "All men have a natural and indefeasible right to worship Almighty God according to the dictates of their own consciences"
They have watched you check all of the fluid levels so that they have piece of mind that these levels are correct.
All sitting very smug on the foundation of centuries of history. All very sort of architectural. And boring. On Thursday we want to try to find the human side of Vienna.
I see my garbage rise again from beneath the snow.
1a) 3 X ME Bench Press @ 80% – rest 60 sec.
6)A full explanation of why the Party has gone from being £2.3 million in credit to a deficit of £600 000 in the past year.
I have learned a lot from my teacher. I have learned that I can be successful in all I want, and although I know I won’t have all the answers, I have faith. My teacher once shared with me this simple saying, “No one said it would be easy”. When I talk to strangers about my life, my life path, my family, their first reaction is wow, you’re so lucky, blessed, fortunate, and I just add, I worked hard! And I am still working today. My teacher taught me, through work ethic, that if you want something, you need something, and you can go get it.
My favorite version so far? Add 1/2 tablespoon lemon extract to the wet ingredients OR a few tablespoons of lemon zest to the dry. At the end, fold in 1/3 of a cup of sunflower seeds. (I used the unroasted, unsalted variety, but I’ll bet the roasted and salted kind would give these muffins a yummy salty-sweet kick!)
Of course, everybody who wants to see this film, is mainly attracted because of the cast on display here and even as good as some of these all-stars may be, they still can’t seem to get by a shitty script such as this. Judi Dench is lovely as Evelyn, but all of her problems in life are as boring as watching paint dry; Bill Nighy brings a lot of his usual, dry wit to his role here as Douglas, but can’t seem to bring too much character to somebody as dull as this dude; Ronald Pickup is charming as the old, horny dude named Norman, even though he is very under-used; Maggie Smith is pretty much a bitch to everybody around her about 90% of the movie, and the other 10% is some cheesy, emotional arc to her that seems to have come out of nowhere; Celia Imrie plays Jean, and seems like she was totally misplaced in a movie about a bunch of boring, old people; and Penelope Wilton is the most annoying character here as Jean.
A: Oh there are so many things that are wonderful. It is a constant ever changing world of color and design. It is tactile and makes me want to constantly create and sew. I love being surrounded by the most amazing artists who truly understand the need to be creative on a daily basis, just like I do.
Brown Eyed Girls is making videos like this. (mentioned by Eat Your Kimchi in their Troublemaker review)
I finished a good, and rough first draft of my novel.
BAD STUFF: Not very unique. But then again, sequels shouldn’t typically BE unique. They are by definition “more of the same”.
Third, it’s not just skeptics like me and Richard Saunders pointing out the scam, but it seems the law in the United States is catching up with the Power Balance charlatans as well. Just look at this article at the Podblack Cat blog
BPA has been an increasingly decried consumer bogeyman. It's an endocrine disrupter, and as USA Today put it, "It's been linked with diabetes, obesity and cardiovascular disease in humans and has been shown to interfere with reproductive development in animals."
“Wait! My animals are scared too! I need to bring them!”
and this is exactly what others mistaken for a rare
Usually the friends I’m closest to are the same friends I can travel with. If I enjoy traveling with you, if you don’t complain when the trip takes an unexpected turn and if you travel prepared and believe in leaving when we say we will and not making too many stops, we will get along famously. Also, if you understand every waking moment does not have to be filled with discussion or noise, especially in the morning or when I’m hungry or tired, we gonna be cool.
Kátia and Carlos and family are still doing wonderfully! Praying and reading the Book of Mormon every night as a family...it´s amazing the difference it has made in their home and their family :) Carlos, Eduardo and Diogo are going to be baptized this Saturday and they are very excited!! At first we had hoped that the entire family would be able to be baptized together...but Kátia has been struggling a little bit giving up smoking this week and she told us that she would like more time to really feel prepared and ready to be baptized. I was sad at first when I heard, but after thinking about it I realized it would be a good thing. Kátia has made AMAZING progress...and in very little time! She told us that she has almost completely stopped smoking, and just relapsed a few times when she felt stressed or upset about something. She really is learning to trust in the Lord and has a strong testimony that He hears and answers prayers. But she wants to be sure that when she is baptized she is 100% ready to make promises to the Lord and start a new life. So this Saturday it will be and a few weeks later Kátia and her two other sons, Marion and Cássio, that also wanted to wait to be baptized with her. Maybe Carlos will be able to receive the priesthood before then and baptize them himself! :) I looooove this family!
Obviously, David continued to remain in the grave.
The series is still going strong in Japan though the fan scanlations are a bit far behind. The story goes through their years of high school and there are sort of clumps of chapters with certain themes and then it goes on to the next story arc. A fun part is that characters that you may not have noticed or thought much about several chapters back might make a comeback and be important to the story later on.
Every time I went back up to the orphanage, I immediately looked for him. One time he was sick in the hospital, this had happened a lot over his lifetime I was told. I kept visiting. Then our adoption fell through and I stopped visiting. But before I did, I asked the nuns, "can I find a family for Patric (I had learned he was a true orphan (both parents had died) and I knew he had big medical needs, even though I didn't know what they were)?" They said "no". I decided to do what I could medically for him in DRC. I left them with $300 to take him to the big hospital in town where I knew there was a CT machine and a neurosurgeon. I never heard from them again. I figured they had used the money for something else and forgotten about Patric getting the scan. Despite this, I didn't forget Patric.
Of sure obliteration on our paths,
Take a blue marker.
7. The Hot Rats "Queen Bitch" 3:03
There has been a large outcry from people who want to contribute to my campaign despite my “penniless campaign” pledge. I had resisted for the longest time, but I do not want to disappoint all those people who want to contribute. I will have a one-time money bomb on the 31st of this month. This will be the ONLY time I will accept contributions. The money raised from the campaign will be used for things like ad time, yard signs, and tattoos. There will be more information in the days to come.
*She reads through it, afresh goes over the map, the walks about in the game.*
The winner of the organic child toddler pillow from Lullaby Organics is Renee G.
There are a total of 4 entries you may receive: Comment (1 entry), Follower (+1 entry), Facebook and/or Twitter (+ 1 entry), and personal blog/website mention (+1 entry). This is subject to change again in the future for future giveaways.
When to use: An angry outburst suitable for any ref faux pas (real or not) you can think of, this quote is just waiting for the day it can be used at a bar populated by a patron who likes to recite Jack Nicholson’s “You can’t handle the truth!” speech and a gentleman who does impersonations of “that guy who made sound effects”.
Dr. Little holds eight US patents and provisional applications for patents including new methods to fabricate controlled release vehicles in a high throughput fashion; dissolvable synthetic-vasculature; novel complex delivery vehicles; and a description of the first degradable, artificial cell. Since joining Pitt, Dr. Little has received funding from the National Institutes for Health, the National Science Foundation, the US Army, the US Department of Defense, the American Heart Association, The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, the Arnold and Mabel Beckman Foundation, the Wallace H. Coulter Foundation, and several industrial sources that total almost $5 million.
It may not have the prettiest appearance, but the flavour hits you, and it hits you good. Can you handle it?
Well, that's an exhaustive (or exhausting...) look at what we've tried in cloth diapering so far! In my next post, I'll share what cloth diapering involves on a daily basis. And who knows, maybe I'll get some helpful hints from more experienced cloth-diapering moms! *hint hint*
America's craft brewers continue to gain in sales and popularity. Passion and exploration continue to grow as America's beer drinkers enjoy unrivaled quality and diversity of craft brewed beer. The craft brewing industry (small and independent) grew 14 percent by volume and 15 percent by dollars in the first half of 2011, and that growth appears to be accelerating. Of the 1,790 breweries in the U.S., 1,740 are considered craft brewers.
Here are the links to the documents that I read regarding best language teaching practices:
How This Affects My Career Plan
I added floor cushions that used to live in my living room for a little nook for Kalia. I snapped a few pictures of her 'reading' on different days. Such a big girl already! Happy baby = happy Momma!
"What do you do all day?", he snapped. Cliche now; the straw that broke a mother's spirit then. He didn't know the venom in his words.
Which means I'll be expecting a lot of sex.
Perhaps we need to reawaken the ancient Greek democratic model.
Sat-AM: 1:35, 3500' ~ SoBo & Bear Peaks
After all, who am I to argue with such powerful room mates in this temporary dwelling?
I made a blanket fort with crisp white down covers and am eating chocolate from Bottega Louie while looking at overly-expensive hotels in Cannes for fun.
I will never feel safe here. I cannot share myself with these people because they will not understand or accept me. They will never be able to support and encourage me to live fully into my gifts and calling because their worldview does not allow it.
And it can come from the most unlikely sources. I’d like to tell you about someone who dazzles me with light. She’s a woman who sells candy outside my son’s school. Her name is Naima (not Naima from the baking project, it’s a common name) and she is one of the more joyful, exuberant people I know. She’s got this cart that she had made, and it’s a child’s delight, full of every kind of candy and trinket. She pushes this cart to the school in the morning, noontime and afternoon school, as many as four times a day. My son is a regular customer, both because he likes candy, and because I really, really want to support her. I often stop by after dropping him off at school, just to get a little dose of Naima to start my day off right. I never know what the topic will be. So I might ask her a question, like, “how did you get started with this cart?” She’ll animatedly tell me all about how she got it made and how she started out, and then she will offer the spiritual wisdom behind it. ”Honey, I’d rather make one dirham the right way than a million dirhams the wrong way!”. Or if she had a day off, she’d say “Our body has a right over us! These hands, these feet, they have their rights! They’re going to bear witness against us if we aren’t good to them”. She is smiling and animated, and has this amazing faith in God. I doubt she can read or write, but she has a deep, strong wisdom about life, the human soul and our journey.
From a bondless ocean,
Though the Mage witch Skye has a gentle heart, demonic forces have enslaved her, forcing her to kidnap Paenther, a powerful and dangerous Feral Warrior. Even chained and naked, Paenther is a cunning prisoner who seduces her, body and soul, turning captive into captor.
you can scribble, upload a picture, make a video or just write something.
Mariano 'Chicho' Frumboli (CH): Each day that we go to a milonga, do an exhibition or a show, we are writing tango history, and this is a contribution. Many young people have gotten involved with tango; we are living the beginning of a powerful era. The genre is here to stay, there is no way that it will become hidden or marginalized again. It is constantly evolving.
Also included are excerpts from a 1984 interview with actor Sterling Hayden for French television. He talks about working in Hollywood and with Kubrick. Quite the colorful character, Hayden is refreshingly candid about his experiences making films.
Most people know that too much sugar can contribute to health issues. Children bounce off the walls the day after Halloween from sugar overload. Weight-conscious people switch from regular sugar to the “pink” packet as a sweetener for their coffee. But, most people don’t know that “sugar” ages you and directly contributes to organ damage. I put “sugar” in quotes because this issue is not just about powdered sugar, but also includes foods that turn into glucose once the food has gone through the digestive process. I tell patients to choose “chewy” foods over “smooshie” foods. If you have to chew a food more before swallowing, such as an apple, whole grain bread or oatmeal, it does not cause a spike in your blood sugar like a food that requires little chewing, such as a banana, white bread or corn flakes.
Expect another of these articles very soon…
Harvard Kennedy School
Shaving Cream (NON Aerosol)
- $.50/1 cpn printable
1 1/2 teaspoons vanilla extract
Lysius had to attain his citizenship and it cost him much financially. For most people this would be impressive. He sacrificed much to obtain the benefits of Rome. I might ask at this point, “How secure was that citizenship?’ Could it not be revoked? Perhaps this was one of his fears had he made the mistake of scourging Paul, a Roman as well, without cause.
Since Christmas morning, Maddie has done little else but take pictures. The kid has burned through three sets of batteries and has uploaded over 350 pictures onto our computer. Most have been the random pictures you would expect from an almost 4 year old. Like pictures of her painted finger nails...
The difference? Squirrels!
Today was very rainy. We tried to work some stuff outside but it was really went. Then I had to go to the store after work to get dog food. The dogs did great in the store. There weren’t any other dogs in the store. Her reactive barking wasn’t too bad today.
We’ll talk soon.
Channa dal: 1.5 cups
The grounds outside have now been tarmaced and posts have been placed at the far end of the site.
First up is HAED's Princess Izzy. Here's the before shot from last months update.....
This detergent is residue free and contains no Phosphates. It is made in the USA.
She did get it, and didn't like it too much, lol.
ITC LTD. – Bse code – 500875 – last close – 244.4 – BUY – 237.4 – SL – 233.2 – for TG1 Rs. 247.7 and for TG2 Rs. 252.6 – stock opened at Rs. 243.5 hit intraday high Rs. 247.4 hit intraday low Rs. 242.7 stock was during trading up 1.2 % from previous close and closed at Rs 245.3
Last night of DMT tonight, where we spent some time, with a glass of wine, looking at new emerging technologies. It was a timely class, with the recent release of the iPad and today’s release of the iPhone4. Yes, there are other companies that are working on tablets and telephones, and a lot are using the flexible, possibly a little too flexible Android operating systyem. So let’s stay with Apple for tonight’s post.
Last time I was in Portland, the Cascade Brewing Barrel House was a couple of weeks away from opening, so this time I made sure to visit. It's just a ten-minute walk from HOTD. This is the place for aged sour beers; they had many types to try -- some aged 12. 16, or 24+ months.
Welcome to the Alphabakes challenge for May! This month it's slightly harder… I hope you can all come up with some great ideas and that you don't think this month's letter is horrible….. Have you guessed what it is yet?!
He defended the council’s move to call for the EGM, pointing out that lawyers have spoken up in the past “against any violation of human rights and failure to uphold the rule of law.”
In adolescents and adults, the disturbance is manifested by symptoms such as preoccupation with getting rid of primary and secondary sex characteristics (such as request for hormones, surgery or other procedures to physically alter sexual characteristics to simulate the other sex) or belief that he or she was born the wrong sex.
L-R: Catrice #400 Blue Cara Ciao, Catrice #350 Hip Queen Wears Blue Jeans, essence magnetic in #03 Magic Wand, essence colour & go in #78 blue Addicted, Mavala in #225 Sparkling Blue
A beautiful Cath Kidston Spring bedroom....yummy girls!
to lighten up the night of
This weekend I watched on, as my Beloveds youngest sibling, got married.
1 Cor. 15: 29
3. Start a vegetable garden. If anything actually grows, I will can and freeze that which we cannot eat or donate.
Im late, but I had to find all the questions n such, so heres to catching up!
10.2 Iced World (Edit) 8:39
What I got from North Melbourne Legal Service was so much more than skilful legal representation. By hearing me and supporting me to take my victimisation before a court of law, they gave me a public voice to express the devastating consequences of crime. The day we went to court and received the acknowledgment and recognition of a judge was transformative for me. To have the criminal held accountable, to have the system recognise that a crime had been committed and that what had happened to me was completely unacceptable was incredibly significant in helping me to believe once more that I could trust my community.
We’re living in an age where everybody wants everything
3. Popular Science Magazine, November 2005, ” Can we stop storms.”
As for criticism of the Chevy Volt, outspoken Akerson responds: “It’s funny to me. I don’t have the luxury of seeing the world through a political prism. If you watch NBC they say it’s the greatest car ever made. You watch Fox, they say it’s the worst car ever made, and they say there have been explosions and fires. Let me give you a few facts: There’s never been a fire in a Volt. Never.
It was a nice relaxing day. I had tentatively planned to take advantage of the day off to write up the next part of my philosophy of education, which is currently sitting in a moleskine notebook in note-form (makes sense, right?), but I ended up doing other things instead, like watching The X-Files season one on Netflix and doing some research on my status as a Highly Qualified teacher.
5 gille
- taking action alongside civil servants (yes, okay that's another)
COPENHAGEN BEER CELEBRATION
I explained why I was calling: that hubby had had the paperwork for months now, that I was anxious to get it over with, that I cannot imagine why, on earth, he would not return the paperwork to me. “Don’t you think this is a loose-end we need to tie up?” I asked. After all, she has a baby she might like to legitimize after the fact.
That's it for today, enjoy the rest of your week!
There’s so much I haven’t yet shared with you, so I’ll do that before the actual blog.
They are members of the Brooklyn Historical Society’s Exhibition Laboratory (ExLab) after-school program, and they were responsible for curating an exhibit about the evolution of Brooklyn into the place we know today.
Servings: Approximately 12 small cookies
So I can’t wait to do it again today!
Chiyanike, of the family of Chief Chinamora. Also Zhakata and his family came to Chishawasha and begged a place to live and Chinamora agreed. All these people were Nhohwe, they lived in Chishawasha for many years until they returned to their it country.
What kind of morning person are you?
The jewelry at the outlet was all additional 40% off yesterday, which was why I was able to get such a good deal. Even if you don't make it by a J.Crew outlet anytime soon, I think whenever you visit you will be happy with the baubles that they offer at such great prices!
Charlie Harcourt - Guitar
So what mechanisms does Dawkins suggest for generating such an infinite, randomly ordered World Ensemble? First, he suggests an oscillating model of the universe, according to which
We have not done our usual stuff this winter. We just really got into Island Life! But it’s been anything but boring!
There is one caveat, however—the dogs and cats are not allowed to talk.
My procrastination on facing the truth spoils it beyond recognition and I lose the battle way before I step into the field. Nothing good ever comes out of it, then why am I still on the same path, making the same mistakes over and over again?
“Laurie” (the fictitious name of a real patient) is a lean, active young mother of three. An avid tennis player, she looks great and she says she feels great. But, we uncover a dark reality lurking within her body… she has elevated AGEs. If she doesn’t turn things around, she is at increased risk for heart disease, stroke, cataracts, cancer and premature death.
What an elegant tool! It immediately calms the "upset", the "intoxicated", or just the down right obnoxious! And is so much fun to watch!
Quick story: In college I got so sick of people bumming slices when I'd order pizza, I started ordering anchovies every time, because it was the only thing that could keep people from wanting any.
Rabbi Shlomo Riskin, citing a tradition that echoes Isaiah's warning, comments:
(Poor little Gray had to spend yesterday in his snow suit to stay warm. The poor little guy must be sensing the stress because he's been quite out of sorts. He's always shivering (even when bundled) and very clingy. The kids are all confused and upset but mostly hanging in there. Like I said, it's been nice to have friends to keep us company.)
My Project today will be brief. I know you have a lot of blogs to hit will all the wonderful projects we will be showing off today! This holiday wreath is small but stunning.
The National Assembly resolution had “clearly represented the legitimate reaction of the people of Pakistan”, she said. Khar described Rohrabacher’s resolution as “an unfriendly and irresponsible attempt by a few individuals in Washington” to create distrust between the people of the US and Pakistan.
You will need to have some pure canned pumpkin handy - not pumpkin pie filling - and some pumpkin pie spice too. The rest of the ingredients you probably have already. I used my Keurig to brew up 1/2 a cup of espresso coffee (a Timothy's K-Cup) but feel free to brew up your espresso any way you prefer. You can add up to 4 shots if you like a stronger coffee taste or just one for a hint of that nutty flavor.
Picknick Smoked was one of my favorites. The pulled pork was nice and smoky, and not too drenched in sauce. They also put cole slaw on the sandwich, which I like. Their Arnold Palmers (half iced tea and half lemonade) were some of the best thirst quenchers of the day.
4 table
This week, authorities announced that Mexican soldiers, using information from the FBI and other sources, had arrested Ricardo Valles de la Rosa, an Azteca sergeant, in Juarez.
We have a tenancy to think that how things are now, is pretty much how they have always been, with only fashions and our tech toys changing.
Anyway, we arrived at the Western North Carolina AG Center shortly after 9:00 a.m. This was the first sign we saw:
Now, will they end up drafting Luck? Or will they go with Heisman winner Robert Griffin III? He is slated by many to be selected with the 2nd pick, currently held by the St. Louis Rams. However, St. Louis believes they’ve got their QB of the future in Sam Bradford. This clearly raises more questions: will the Rams trade their 1st round pick? If the colts draft RG III, will the 2nd selection be Andrew Luck?
God, what do you want me to say?
Total frustration had caused me to throw the styrofoam cup across my office. Fortunately, only a few drops of cold coffee splattered against the eggshell wall. The fifth refill was almost completely finished after a morning of “boot and re-boot”.
I keep waiting to post because I feel like I have nothing to say. Because I keep thinking that maybe tomorrow I’ll come up with something brilliant. Because I’m never in “the right head space” – whatever that means. Because I just feel complainy every day and no one needs to hear anyone else complain.
People have started to give immense interest toward house designs, interior, exterior and many other innovative forms available in the modern age building concepts. Interior decoration, painting, furniture and flooring are some of the highlighted aspects with enormous importance at the time of construction. Professionals with knowledge of modern day techniques in the building industry, install fencing panel.
We’re BIG seafood eaters in our family. One of my favorite dishes that Jeff’s mother Kathy makes are her Oysters Rockefeller appetizer. This recipe is great- hands down the best Oysters Rockefeller I’ve ever had. These are a perfect appetizer in the summertime, or any time of the year really!
Is it pathetic that I'm super excited about my nails this week? Because I am. I love them.
with UBINIG of Bangladesh
I’m not in any hurry to wait for my lover again
According to the written decision from the ZBA hearing six years ago: "Mr. Wiseman stated that UMass is aware of the community’s concerns and that UMass needs to do more to work with the town on this problem. He has met with neighbors regarding their concerns about students. He further noted that ZBT’s national office is responsive and works with its chapter presidents to keep houses in a proper manner."
What is that??
If and when I actually follow a recipe while cooking you can be guaranteed that if the recipe calls for fresh garlic that I will double or triple the amount called for. I absolutely adore that stinking rose it has such a multi-faceted flavor personality. It can be bold, sweet, gentle and sometimes a little unkind in certain situations but always gets along well with any dish it touches
Some people dispel an awkward situation by making a joke to seemingly insult someone and then add the infamous "just kidding!" to alleviate any offense they might have caused. But what I would be wondering was how much of that joke was actually true.
The Harvard Crimson published a story today (Wednesday) that I found quite touching. Seems a pastor at the university, the Rev. Peter J. Gomes, had a tradition of hosting Wednesday Tea. It sounds rich:
Many thanks to MCA for keeping tabs on what DAP lied. But MCA, do you know that by remaining in BN you are tacitly accepting APARTHEID for the minorities and thus are as unvotable as DAP? How about asking PM Najib to grant :
This swatch is of 11.10.9s - Ruby Slippers. I tried making a swatch of 11.10.9 Crimson, but it shattered every time I put it even near the flame. I am guessing that's not normal for the color, as Kim was able to work with it without having it shatter.
When I got married, I really wanted a daughter. I felt that a girl will be closer to me, understand me better as a woman, as a person, and be my companion through my life. I wanted to live out certain fantasies through a daughter, do all that my mother and I could not do because of her busy schedule. Subconsciously I also felt guilty of not really giving my mother her due. And perhaps I wanted to complete that circle by always being there for my daughter.
Immediately to the right of that ziploc bag, on the paper towel? The pile of copper headpins I enameled on April 17. They are all cleaned up, and ready for use. They need to be put in their box (and yes, I have a box ready for them) until I'm ready to use them. But, alas, I am a hopelessly lazy piler. No telling how long they will lie there on my bench, in my way. And I wonder what's under that paper towel? I didn't look.
And here’s the DT’s take on the sketch
"Oh, that'd be my best friend Amy. She let me sleep on her couch this one time when I--"
13. Tie the little sucker's front paws to rear paws with garden twine and bind tightly to leg of dining table, find heavy-duty pruning gloves from shed. Push pill into mouth followed by large piece of filet steak. Be rough about it. Hold head vertically and pour 2 pints of water down throat to wash pill down.
“Manny, we need to know what this here fella knows,” Pappy said, a placid look on his face.
Intriguing indeed! How can we vote God who is not even a candidate? In Vernon’s article he suggested (which inspire me),
I, on the other hand, did not grow up in a pet-friendly household. My mother did not care for cats. She was afraid of big dogs—she'd been bitten as a small child—and above all she didn't want anything in the house that shed!
1938 – Gary Collins (actor: Born Free, The Iron Horse, Roots, The Sixth Sense, The Wackiest Ship in the Army)
Game Nutz Podcast: Adventure 11
 More and more White families – the entire middle class and eventually upper-class Whites as well – will be forced to live in and raise their children in a much more dangerous third-world society and a much more Negrified and Mexicanized (non-White, non-European) culture. (Many if not most of the lower class Whites have already been put in this terrible situation, of course.)
Connie Lloyd, Tee Tree
Have a nice day. Happy St George's Day; happy birthday to Shakespeare; and I'm back to the saltmines :o)
My boyfriend Ed brought along his video camera, and put a lot of effort into creating a fun reminiscent video. Some of the dialogue, especially Bobnoxious - was very entertaining. Or maybe not if you weren't there.
This transition time is precious and full of lessons, though, and for all of it I am grateful. I have always wanted to be a mother and have lots of experience with children of various ages, but nothing prepares you for having a child of your own. It is challenging and beautiful and so many other things at any given moment of the day. Miraculous, always. The gift of being able to take this all slowly and figure it out as we go along is amazing and all possible thanks to my hard-working, understanding, helpful husband.
With hostility to the locations of wind farms causing political tension concerns are mounting that renewable energy investments are being put on hold, as investors question the degree of political backing for cleaner energy.
Heat a large, deep sauté pan with olive oil on medium heat. Add the mushroom slices and let them cook without moving them to ensure they get dark and well-done. Then flip them to cook the other side. (If you grill the mushroom caps, let cool, then slice them and add to pan).
I look forward to giving you more updates on this project!
Terry
My best friend and I do exactly that, consciously, when we work out together… It’s like a tug of war. We set a goal of 20 lunges for example, and we absolutely have to do 21 or 22, looking each other in the eye, making sure that we push ourselves so hard, that we both clench our teeth and groan with the muscle pains! I guess it’s un poco loco… but it gets the job done. We leave the gym on shaky legs, sweat dripping off our red faces, panting hard, but with this astounding sense of achievement and pride and feeling good about our bodies…
As promised, but later than planned due to computer issues, here is the winner of my 100 followers giveaway!
I'm still halted.
After making a film as perfect as Sunset Blvd. in 1950, many directors would have found themselves on that inevitable downward slide, forever trying to match the greatness of their earlier masterpiece. Not so with Billy Wilder. Not only did he continue to make such remarkable films as The Apartment and Some Like It Hot, but in 1957 he nearly equaled his 1950 achievement with a movie that has stood the test of time like few others: Witness for the Prosecution.
Thanks to the good old Rama Sethu issue, Rama’s name is on the lips of all believers and non-believers alike, doing a world of good to politicians, lawyers, judges, journalists and lay people too.
then the words disintegrated in so much air
And that is Nick walking independently with it. I'm not helping his feet or moving the walker. He is doing it ALL BY HIMSELF! And we were all there!
Added Advanced search section for 4shared files.
The Cole family is a founding family in terms of Maine’s commercial trucking. For something that was close to 90 years, Cole’s Express trucks were fixtures on Maine and New England’s highways. Cole’s Express hauled everything from paper, potatoes, and various other items that start with a “p.” From 1917 to 1992, Cole’s Express hauled heavy loads way out in Maine.
S4-239 Classic Scall Border petites / S4-201 Deckle Rec sm
And speaking of the Catholic Church…
“Your going to help look into this right?” Reilly had no idea what there was to look into, but he couldn’t let his friend shoot his career in the foot, so he nodded in agreement.
“Not everybody, Mell. I’ve made enemies.” He took a long drink from the tankard next to him.
“What the hell, Kenny?” spat a fellow detective at the desk across the aisle from his.
As well as Karen's wonderful digital image sets her store also stocks more than £16,000 of craft products. Karen is offering our lucky winner TWO fabulous digital bundles of their choice.
Outrage in Germany, Nobel Laureate Günter Grass has, once again told the truth about Israel being the greatest threat to world peace.
Personal Responsibility and Charity. As mentioned above, being free also comes with responsibility. You are free to fry your lung through cigars or cigarettes but don’t blame others when cancer comes knocking on your doors. You see, that is the beauty of a society that appeals to the individualistic tendencies of man, for it allows man to make decisions on his own and face the harsh consequence of it. People should be prepared to face whatever it is that comes with the decisions that they make, they should never blame others nor expect sympathy or help from others. But this is not to say that we humans should be selfish and refuse to help the needy. Which is why I am truly adhere to the idea of Charity, for this is an action that FREE individuals take. FREE individuals help the needy not because someone (state) forces them to do it, FREE individuals help others out of their own will; they do it voluntarily. Isn’t it much more desirable when you give something to the needy when you do it out of your own free will? And besides, take this for example: if I give my 100 directly to the needy I’m pretty much sure that he/she will get it fully, but if I give my 100 pesos to a third-party (state) how can I be so sure that the third-party will give the full amount to the needy?
Gnats.
I hope to be a true woman of God - more faithful - kinder, more patient, softer in my words and attitude - loving and I hope for the courage to stand up and live more righteously the role I have as a mother. I know I am doing part of this through the way I dress and coming before him each day in a modest and feminine way.
Best Actor Charles Chaplin, Modern Times (7 votes)
Will viewing the world through your child's eyes change the way you see things? Will it change the things you do or say? Can you put yourself in that place? I want to hear from you.
I was overjoyed when Kate was born with a beautiful dimple! It keeps getting deeper and deeper as she gets older!
You mentioned before you cannot drink alcohol until this year according to your doctor's advice. Why was that? Are you allowed to drink alcohol now?
“ . . . if I had to perish twice,
It is very difficult to write an engaging story around a message, which is why there are very few that people, and children especially, read for fun. Books with messages do not always get enjoyed because the message is the center of the story, as opposed to the adventure itself. This is why children are not reading The Giver outside of schools. When people want to read a book for fun, they do not always choose the one with the heavy meaning behind it. Remember, however, that I do not speak for everyone, only for myself. Some people do read these books, and I congratulate them. However, books written for their stories (and not their messages) tend to get a better response.
These nights
The photo does look better than the lingerie looked on the runway, but I’m still not a fan! The girls on the runway looked like they had underwear on that people wore like 100 years ago. I just don’t like either of these designs!
wilted greens with smoked trout, echo mountain blue cheese, hazelnuts
* Oreos,
Turbinado sugar or other coarse sugar for sprinkling
Cow patties is starting the monthly giveaways again! So make sure you get in on this fabulousness!
My advice to the Tango Tourist, especially the First Timer:
There were so many people there. My family and many of my friends had pulled a fast one on me. I had received texts, phone calls and facebook messages throughout the day from most of these people! And there they all were. It was so awesome.
Adam Hills – Top bloke, family friendly, take-him-anywhere, show him off in front of the kids or Grandma. Always around without wearing out his welcome and always delivers what he promises. Also able to provide those little quality highlights that make him a ‘must-watch’. Little Creatures Pale Ale.
Music is a part of me. I listen. I play (several instruments). I compose. And today I was listening to my favorite playlist while working out at the gym. Working out is this thing I do to try to put the brakes on the aging process. You see, after all those years of giving my body everything it wanted–relaxation, Coke, guacamole pepper jack cheeseburgers and ketchup-laden fries–it has turned on me! It’s a full rebellion, and now my body is blaming me for the weight gain, sluggishness, achy joints and asthma. Imagine!
great way to engage our students in their learning experiences.
7 Reasons Deadly Premonition is Game of the Year
bring it on monday, bring it on.
That is, until today.
Be on!
Currently, unless you have exceptional influence with your Bank, you are likely to find it quite difficult to secure mortgage finance.
Watching the diver working in the tank was pretty cool. He had to bat away a turtle that kept swimming into him, which was funny. You have to respect a guy that dives into a tank full of sharks and stingrays to keep the tank running and the fish healthy.
"...I had his face behind my eyelids. And I thought if I could see him, even just for a day, it would be worth a hundred years. One day is all I deserved, and I've had so many already. I've won. I've won!"
For those of you who haven’t made that valuable change, why not just give it a try and then sit back, enjoy a healthier smoking experience today and watch as the remarkable savings grow.
Cassandra – 92 (38.49%) – is blonde now, looks cute that way!
Prior to my pregnancy, I could do at least 10 push ups with no problem whatsoever, so to go from that to barely being able to do 2 was a major disappointment. When I did my trial, I was able to do 4 good form push ups before I felt like I was going to die. And, you know what? I’m ok with that.
Jesus Christ! The guy knows all the class lists and who's who! Unbelievable, and again, intriguing!
“Now it looks like we will have to fight for our right to gather at Merdeka Square as well as fight for free and fair elections,” said Muhammed Hafiz, a 28-year-old store clerk who was preparing to join the protest.
These demographic changes, together with economic pressure from growing public and personal debt, and increasing pressure for a change in the law to allow euthanasia, produce a toxic cocktail indeed.
My favourite rides at a funfair are the carousels, be it chairoplanes or the old-fashioned ones with horses and carriages. Which mode of carousel-transportation do you go for when you have the choice? Do you prefer to ride in Mary Poppins style on horses or swans or drive in carriages. busses or fire-engines? I chose the horse this time, but my real favourite always was the little sphere that you could spin around manually, giving you a dizzying carousel ride!
Every construction site leaves behind a permanent fund of debris; every line of progress, whether physical or mental, is interrupted by the movement or will of another. For every kind of activity that is organized and regulated, there exists a shadow world where those in need and those who have something to offer find a way of coming together. Now that I don’t live in Mumbai all year round any more, I find that I can return to it just by opening to any page in Dickens’s work. Under the surface differences of names, streets, and manners, it is a similar world.
These are a couple of the cards I made this month and I loved the papers so much that I couldn't wait and placed another order of goodies to play with. This time I ordered bright spring colors and even more bling to play with. Do join me for a couple of minutes so you too can see the quality and enjoy the goodies that I received from Close To My Heart.
We then see the address iCarly.com being typed into some kind of Internet browser. We all seen this before, so I won’t dwell on this.
for You can do all things.
Under this heading Mr Sheridan put again to Mr Bird that he had “broken the law by ordering illegal surveillance” and planting “listening devices” Mr Bird replied that was “not true.“
The morning unfolds surprisingly. They leave at mid-morning break feeling confident and light. So far, so good. We come back for our second session, and nerves are more relaxed this time. No tight stomach muscles for me, anyway. I even read a little in between selections.
Hours: 8h54
I was particularly moved by Emma's observations about the end of the novel, something about which very few have commented. And so I share those words here, with the hope that you will visit Emma's blog and discover not just her review of Neighbors, but her fine mind in general.
What, below, is there not to like? Not much, I suspect, will your answer if you are not familiar with the provisions of the Convention and the Human Rights Act. So why do 75% of Sun Readers polled want to get rid of the Act? Are we living in a country populated by nutters and fascists? No… I suspect the truth of the matter – and I mean no criticism – is that most people don’t actually know how valuable the Convention and the Act is to our country and to maintaining peace in Europe, simply because they haven’t studied it in detail. They do not see the wood for the trees (and, again I mean no criticism) because Tabloids don’t want to look at success or detail, they just want to bang on about unelected judges releasing terrorists into the community so they can kill everyone, including themselves… and thereby, sell a few more newspapers. The Daily Mail, the Daily Express – and even The Sun and The Mirror are not exactly immune to such seductive money make ‘SCOOPS’.
In life
Fee aman Allah habibi Qahtan. Mama loves you very much and so do your english Grandparents and Uncles. xxx mwahh (big kisses on your head.)
“I think I’ll go with ‘D’,” she says.
The film screening left many stunned. I had my sister next to me, crying. It was a tear-jerker, undoubtedly. But to imagine that this was a plight of one of the 6 million Jews that were exterminated (plus another 1 million as ‘others’) , it did shake the foundations.
On arrival, I find Slayer, his face covered in Emulsion (apparently as a cheap alternative to sunscreen) sitting in the outdoor courtyard rocking backwards and forwards on his chair. He looks up, sees me, slips and jams his hand in between his chair and the railings. He ponces a pint off me and then just sits in silence drinking the beer I have just bought him and rubbing his hand. He is clearly in some discomfort.
created a new stencil that I'm using today! I'll of course let you guys know how it goes.
A stamp from France, showing a self-portrait of Albrecht Durer. This is the Self-portrait with a thistle, in the Louvre. (Durer painted several others.) This is part of my collection from the early days, when my roomate C. was receiving letters and packages from her mother in France.
“I repudiate, and I call on the President to repudiate, the concept of the 99 and the 1. It is un-American, it is divisive, it is historically false…You are not going to get job creation when you engage in class warfare because you have to attack the very people you hope will create jobs.”
For me, the day came and went without event. I’ve finally found my blogging groove again after the two weeks post blog tour, one weird side effect I couldn’t have seen coming. Between the end of the tour and some real life stuff happening at the same time, I admit I was a bit moody. It was enough for one of my dear blogger friends to email me
Tomorrow is Good Friday and in England it is traditional to eat hot cross buns, or rather it was, as I reckon the supermarkets and bakeries bring them out just after Christmas; and why not? They are delicious after all. The reason that Good Friday is the day these buns are traditionally baked goes back to Tudor times, when the sale of spiced buns was illegal, except on Good Friday, at Christmas and at funerals.
I would love to hear more from you about this! Do you think parent blogs or other blogs written my non-book professionals have a place in the book conversation? Maybe since I'm not trained in book reviews I should stick to sippy cups? How can librarian, schools, author/illustrators and bookstores work with bloggers to promote books?
Waiter-"Right. Chips are on the way."
Megan Battistella was told not only to not hand out the information but that she could not talk to people about amendment one. Megan asked “I can still talk to people right” and the officer said that he was just giving her a fair warning.To put some more light on the location of that this took place, it was on a PUBLIC greenway that was being rented out by ”Kings Drive Art Walk” and there was no signs indicating that it was a closed event or that the public was not welcome. In fact I was never approached about my taking photographs in this area.
Lee jacket, boots shirt, Levi's jeans, Eddie Cochran pin, Arizona pin, and paint splattered boots, all vintage
-alhamdulillah, i enjoy the session.
In My Mailbox was started by The Story Siren.
“Well she told me that you went back to Eckerd Hall and that you were at the “Perkins” next door. I went all the way back there only to find not a “Perkins”, but an “Applebee’s” next door. There are too many restaurants around here.” I tried to sound contrite; even blameless.
We’ll leave the light on for ya!
WORM (write once, study many) is an advantageous feature incorporated within AIT4 technology to supply tamper-proof information backup copies. The data saved upon AIT-4 WORM tape remains safe and secure against all kinds of working errors for example inadvertent information erasure, adjustments and over-writings. Sony AIT4 drives feature a sealed mp3 path area, which provide outstanding protection towards dust contaminants along with other pollutants. Therefore, the actual This supervisors may reliably backup/store data in messy workplace environments.
diaper
A wise man knows that knowledge comes and goes, but that experience of spiritual certainty was more than ordinary knowledge. A wise man knows that some feelings are worth following across the desert, are worth giving up wealth to purchase frankincense, gold, myrrh. Those wise men knew that seeing that star meant they should drop everything and see the King of Israel's newborn son.
Because instead of going to sleep at a reasonable hour (I know with work it is sometimes difficult, but that doesn't excuse the other 4 nights out of 7) you are doing what you should have been doing in the day.
And then you have the academic concerns cropping up over the last little while.
08/18/2010 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1227.48 08/24/2010 1221.61 +5.88
D: The Amendments to the United States Constitution (1791-1992). . . . .pg. 243
the shopping cart, you name it. He has whole-heartedly enjoyed being able to move on his own.
His life straightens out,
Other improvements to Cinedrome are in the planning stages and will be rolled out as they mature. Meanwhile, stay tuned for a return to regular posting. Next up: Preston Sturges.
“What did you say about me rat trap? I haven’t got a rat trap, I haven’t got rats ave' I?
The B-side "Happy Shopper" was the A-side of their previous single, which was withdrawn after the cut-price food chain objected to its content. A prolonged, jerky rant against domestic bliss, the singer Jeff regularly screams "Who bought these tea bags?" in fury, whilst the verses are punctuated with the line "She grabs a plastic fish fork and she buggers me". There's a certain Stump-iness to the rhythm section on this track, but both sides remind me much, much more of Australian pranksters TISM. FIAFT could easily have been their Home Counties brothers.
My grandfather who has been in bad health recently is doing worse we don't know how much longer he has but it is probably not very long. I don't know how I feel about this as I have never had a good relationship with him. He tried to beat me when I was only five because I tried to kick my seven year old cousin who was living with us at the time out of the house my grandparents were visiting and were in their RV out in the yard which is where my cousin went, I had to barricade a door until my parents got home and yelled at my grandfather because in their mind it did not matter what I did they would not beat me or let him beat me. I have no other strong memories of him and from what I have been told of my mother's childhood she(well not so much she, she was practically invisible to her parents no matter what she did) and her sibling were beaten regularly in today's society they would have been removed from their home. So it hard to feel sad for a man that was so terrible add to that that he was an alcoholic, a functioning one but still and knowing that part of that fueled my mother's(well when she did get them) , aunts, and uncle's( two aunts one uncle that died before I was born but that is a story for a different post) beating makes it harder. I know my grandmother will be sad an my mom and that makes it hard but I don't know how I will truly feel and that is hard.
I have always thought that this is the worst thing one could possibly have happen to them. The not knowing is, i believe, worse than knowing that your child is dead. No closure is the ultimate worst thing one can have to go through. I do not have any children, however (i know i know this sounds so pathetic but he was my family!) when my cat went missing for a week when i was in my early 20′s, it was excruciating thing to endure. I was given a tiny glimpse of the type of anguished anxiety that is present 24 hours a day until that loved one is found. After flyer-ing and checking the shelters and asking neighbors and re-flyer-ing, there is nothing else one can do but hope and pray that you get your loved one back.
i think that part’s the best.
There’s a lot of feelings that remain since you’ve been gone. I guess you thought that I wanna put it all behind me. But it seems there’s always something right there to remind me. (2)
Trudy looks up at me with her gorgeous spaniel eyes, puzzled at the loud voices and I whisper to her, “I have to do everything round her, it’s so not fair.” I bury my face in her soft coat and wonder how things got so bad. Trudy starts to lick my face and calms me like always.
Unlimited Toad-House Items Clear Every Level, including able annual levels.
Italy’s jobless rate rose to the highest in more than a decade in February and the International Monetary Fund forecast on April 17 that unemployment will reach 9.9 percent this year. Italian bonds reversed morning gains yesterday after the government cut its growth forecasts and abandoned a goal to balance the budget next year.
I have a great hope- I will be spending eternity with Christ. He looked at me in my hopelessness and with my sinful mind and actions and loved me so much He became a man and died in my place. Love like that is so beyond what I can fathom, but I trust that my sin has been forgiven. I am wiped clean!!
— Frankie
When looking though the troves of dating advice out there, remember to keep your common sense. If something sounds crazy, don’t do it. Most dating experts write partially based on their own experiences. It may be that you don’t want the kind of relationship they do. The first step to finding solid advice is to conceptualize what you want in a relationship. The real struggle in a relationship, though, is not finding one, but maintaining one. For those of you who need it, here’s a reality slap of sound dating advice.
It’s in this love that i am fighting.
June 26
And if you don’t give it him, there’s others will, I said.
Coffee taster (I do this, a lot. I pay)
‘I have nightmares about the children I’ve seen with horrific birth defects caused by the tonnes of uranium that’s been used in the war. And I mean horrific Dyl’, mutations a special effects crew would find hard to replicate.’
Next came the publication of the National Stroke Strategy in 2007, setting out what good quality care, from prevention and acute care to rehabilitation and other long-term support, should look like. It presented 20 quality markers for the assessment of services.
(Sean watching Ali's audition)
I smile to myself and change the song on my iPod.
If the trimmer or saw runs away at full throttle you may have ......
It appears Jablonski is not in attendance as the attorneys return, all go to the plaintiff table 24 minutes after meeting in the judge’s chambers.
I used the Dynamic Views template this time, just for a change, and I have to say I’m not sure I’m pleased with it. It has its pros and cons—on one hand, it’s a much cleaner, simpler design. I feel it’s easier to navigate and so much less cluttered. On the other, you have to scroll over things like the Followers widget for them to appear, which might mean that people won’t follow. Also, a lot of other gadgets aren’t available. You can’t see my tweets anymore, or my blog roll. On the third hand, I’m some sort of monster with three hands.
Creedence Clearwater Revival
Special Offer: Up to 1,500 miles when you book a Royal Caribbean cruise by April 30, 2012 and sail by December 31, 2012. (500 miles for oceanview cabin, 1,000 miles for balcony, and 1,500 miles for a suite)
Jaunting back across the pond for another American debut, Professor Elemental gave us “Sweet Cold Consolation,” a track if you needed just one reason to add this CD to your collection – the Professor is it. And following it is Sxip Shirey’s “Mehenatta,” a song so toe-tappingly eclectic I think its instrumental oddity will be floating in my head for days… in a good way. The infectious beat continues with The Peculiar Pretzelmen’s “Hammer Nails” track… there’s something about woodwinds and banjo that I just can’t get enough of.
On to the boston cream pie. Which I will not set on the side of the counter. ;)
Seriously, I should start a dating website where we all describe our friends (Recommendedbyme.com?). In just one sentence we've got kind, employed, quirky, athletic and adventurous, how could I possibly say no?
And there you have it: intelligent educated women who do not marry and have children (who are not like "us") were to be gently pitied. They were immune to the natural feelings of 'real' women. Never has it been more obvious that patronising such women is a way of controlling men's fear of them..
Rude Awakening 1989 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
Chloe is having a very busy week at the Traaseths in Gainesville, Georgia. The weather is not as nice as we had hoped, but she doesn't seem to care. The Gavins (including my Live and Learn drumming buddy Austin) came over for a couple days, so it was a festive crowd. Steph picks her up tomorrow for a couple of days of exploring the river and shopping and sightseeing in Athens, and then Chloe flies home Thursday.
This wonderful piece of music is made by Derek Duke and I wrote him a message on Facebook to thank him for the beautiful music and I got this answer
Women are told they are girls.
Hurry come to me
Frankly, I had forgotten how bad the flu was. Isn't it just like a cold? An over-hyped version of the sniffles? Let me tell you now that the answer is no. The CDC gives these differences:
Anyone else get the idea that Sherri Shepherd has been campaigning for this job for a LONG time? She’s SO happy to be on this show, and that’s something I can connect with. Imagine getting teh role of a lifetime on your favourite show? She has a true edge because the same audience that watches The View, watches this show. She will be able to boost The Views ratings with her ‘insiders’ perspective and she’s a figure a huge auudience in a certain demographic see EVERYDAY at 11am. She delivered, because her first dance was great…
The Hunger Games parts
:: Whenever we talk about being big, or strong, or nice or kind, Ryann always says, "Like Jesus?" I'll say something to the effect of "oh we are going to drink milk at lunch (as opposed to water). We have to drink our milk so we get big and strong!" "Like Jesus?" Or "It wasn't very nice for the boy to push you was it. We don't push because we want to be nice to others." "Like Jesus?"
As Michelle continues to mangle a classic ballad, she notices that her gas tank is nearly empty. Oh, and the rain picks up, right on cue. She finds a gas station and pulls in. You know how old this movie is? Gas is $1.14...THAT's how old this movie is! I don't care if there's a murderous psychopath somewhere in the plot, I want to live in this film's world.
you heroes aren’t close to matching me,
So. Thus far I've shared this blog with one person, and she's my only follower to date. Hurray for one follower! Without prompting, Lew starting spewing out blogs she likes to read and like me--does not purchase from--because she too subscribes to the "stuff we like, but cannot afford to buy" category.
Until the next sniff, sip, quaff or quick mouth rinse,
I’m weak
This realization of collaborative work did not transfer over to my academic writing quickly. I slowly awakened to the benefit of peer revision and editing for my own work because I was usually the one editing other people’s works. In high school, I was actually hired as a tutor for various subjects, but I never actually asked others for help on my own papers. Only in college did I really start asking for help with my writing. Obviously, there was always collaboration when the teachers read over our drafts and gave them back full of red ink, but this was always formalized and less effective than individually discussing the papers. The same things that happened with my creative writing eventually occurred when I stared asking for help Freshman year: ideas were exchanged, gaps filled in, and my writing got stronger even when a giant flaw was exposed.
Once all the treats have been coated, place blue candy melts in a zip-top plastic bag; seal. Submerge in hot water until melted, kneading until smooth (or, microwave in 20 second intervals until melted, kneading after each interval). Snip a tiny hole in one corner of the bag and drizzle blue accents over the treats. Let stand until coating is firm.
This whole process helped me to feel a bit renewed, though. I almost felt human, again. Should’a taken the extra step of putting a pair of earings in, just to top off the feeling (I did go so far as to give up the glasses for my contacts). It felt good to get back to something normal. My youngest even got me to dance with her while she played her Kidz Bop Dance game. I felt a little silly and was ever so thankful that no one else was around to see me stumbling over myself (it’s been so long since I’ve danced), but I needed that silly time more than you could ever imagine!
Finally, a few comments upon suicide attempts to which the police are called in an attempt to persuade an individual not to take their own life. Within the last few months at work, I have personally attended two incidents whereby my officers and I have been invited to persuade someone not to kill themselves. One involved threats by an out-of-area mental health patient to jump from a very high bridge over an arterial road into Birmingham which had to be closed for the duration of the threat. He was eventually persuaded back over the barrier and arrested under mental health law. The other involved a man who barricaded himself into his own bathroom with a knife and threatened to take an overdose and / or self-harm. His wife called the police in desperation after he own attempts to ensure his safety failed. He was persuaded, hours later, to come out and go to hospital – bearing in mind the police had no legal powers in this private dwelling as his conduct never quite reached ‘breach of the peace’ territory and he committed no offences. Both incidents involved calling for “hostage / crisis negotiators”, although the first one was resolved before they arrived on scene. Their skills at the second were very impressive indeed.
In the old days (when life was sunny and fairies danced in the meadows...and editors said 'yes' every morning), I never wrote a synopsis. Now I do. What's more I slave over it every bit as hard as I do my books. I have news for you. The rainclouds are overhead, the fairies have gone back to Tir na n-Og...and children's book editors (and agents) say yes as often as geese lay golden eggs. A professional-looking synopsis is therefore essential.
They had full yard bundles, 6 yards for $8... fat quarter bundles... layer cakes... the prices varied from $4 to $24 for a huge fat quarter bundle. Granted, most of it was - in my personal opinion - ugly as sin, but I think I definitely snagged a good bargain. Especially since this is just an experiment and - bonus - I don't have to cut my own strips.
John Edward’s trial is about to get started. He’s being charged with taking illegal contributions to hide an extramarital affair. Everyone in Washington knows it’s wrong to use illegal contributions for anything other than bribes.
And voila!
How do you explain that you really are feeling those emotions, they really are as bad as you say they are, and their changeability is as confusing to you as it is to them?
I know I slept in today…but did I sleep through spring? Last night when I went to bed, it was still winter, today I woke up and it was 80 degrees outside!!! Hello summer??? Where I live we used to have four seasons, winter, spring, summer, fall…but now (thanks to global warming) we seem to only have two left, winter and summer!!! UGH!!!
I would love to make more of these cute this caddies! Guess I'll have to visit Sonic more often this month!!
The Randy "Biscuit" Turner Benefit at Emo's was right on. Lotsa friends and good music. I finally got to see the reunited Dicks play and they sounded like a giant fascist-killing machine. From "Dead in a Motel Room" to "Rich Daddy" to "Dicks Hate Police," it was pure visceral growl. A few more beers and I would've been in the pit (and probably writing this from a prone position in a Vicodin haze).
their little wedding department, pulled out my
a light for revelation to the Gentiles
They're both into breweries and local beer, and Grand Rapids has an assortment of both. I picked up a selection of beers from local brewery Founders, and attached a little notecard. The notecard took me all of five minutes to make...
And the latest addition to Calas Roja family is Shadow. She is a CR local who happened to wander into the complex and was immediately adopted by the owners. Shadow has gotten to know everyone’s habit and greets Vic and Vera in the morning at 6 am before they go for their walk where she will get her first meal of the day, then Charlotte and Gordon will prepare toast, scrambled eggs and bacon and then crazes for the rest of the day. It certainly is a dog’s life.
Sharing the Scootabaker Cupcake Love
- 25th: My sister took me out to eat at Red Robin. Good food! Good company!
Here's the first look at the results coming out in the next Michelin Guide Rouge...
and then He sees them...
What is wrong with these people?? Hospitals need to have a “Naming Warden”, someone you have to check with before your baby’s name goes on the birth certificate. These are not pets, they are humans that have to live with your idiotic decision for the rest of their lives. Cut it out, people.
Alcohol Concern chief executive Don Shenker said it was time to introduce tobacco-style health warnings on alcohol.
At worst, the Coleman report found that the players frequently broke the laws on under aged drinking, but this was by no means an unusual misdemeanour in America, especially in states like North Carolina, where it is illegal to drink under the age of 21.
You can also tell me about it either on my facebook: Okwy Ada or follow on twitter@adaobiokwy or send an email to getminny2@yahoo.com. I would be most glad to write back. also remember to click on the FBook like box and share with others too.
too itchy for sleep but perfect for purloining.
139. Sons and Lovers: D.H. Lawrence
"Oh, I have money, I'm just not sure I have enough. I'll pay you back tomorrow."
When my health started failing, you were still by my side... You know what?"
From what I used to blame the man that make me who I am, I now got to thank him for letting me having such a precious...
His Grace never used the word 'sacked'. If others have done so, then they must answer for their misinformation.
12. Easy Blues (Williams).
they design and make beautiful hats for women and children -
They’re my writer’s group—and they rock.
“To maintain sensibility is the greatest effort required–
to manufacture
So Andrea gets her turn, and the lady tells her that because it's from a different hospital (because he was transferred to a facility with a childrens unit), he can't get the prescription filled there. Ohhh, she was not happy. They said that we could take it to Walgreens (70 bucks), or wait till Monday. Luke was supposed to get a treatment on Saturday night and Sunday night. Not Monday morning.
but you're gonna miss this!!
Next Week: Karma
pieces of chicken breast (sometimes with rib meat) cut into long strips, breaded or battered dipped, and deep fried.
Since I’ve been back, I’ve limited myself to just the bagel sandwiches and, when I’m lucky, I get a free taste of juice.
Now, we have a little video for you showing this set in action and some fun things you can do with it. We hope you enjoy it! Watch it below or at our You Tube channel.
And if I open my big mouth he says; “look, it’s just a game!”
I wrote this on April 15, 2010
Brownies & Beer - September 22
The pressure that the reason we struggle to get pregnant is MY body.
I’ve used to new images from McMahon Vintage releasing today! The frame with the oak leaves acorns is one image and the scripture is another. I thought that they worked so well together that I combined them.
Can I just say one thing? Because when I saw this book I was shocked. I was… confused? Really, I had no idea what it was. Let me explain… when I got it out of my pretty little amazon box, the first thing I saw was the back of the book. Here… take a look for yourself:
And last, but never least, this little freckled boy (he has the cutest little freckles over his nose) finally had a 'big tooth' break through. He will not be toothless much longer (and, ironically, the orthodontist called me out of the blue yesterday and asked me if he had stopped sucking his thumb yet - - it's like they KNOW. HAHA!). :)
Where the shaky hand, the sweaty brow?
Talking of our 'Hop', we'd like to say a massive thank you to each and every one of you who hopped along with us and took part. Without you, it wouldn't have been the success that it was! And keep an eye out over the next day or so, as each member of the DT will be posting their prize winner on their own blogs (if they haven't done already). And I'm sure there'll be a master list posted on here once they've all been revealed!
eGovernment and ICT Literacy
The main purpose of Bush Radio providing an online streaming service is to highlight issues from Cape Town to a global audience, and judging by the feedback we have been getting, it is working.
“Sure, why not?” she replied. “Doing it once doesn't count anyway. You’re still a virgin after a one night stand. I lost my virginity to 23 different men.”
strangely enough, the title is very fitting and not a mere rambling. allow me to expound.
Well, yes and no - depends on how you see it.
Confidence is key on the job search, but cockiness is less than appealing. You certainly don’t want to sound like this jobseeker:
grab a bag of rolls of Costco,
till all I could hear was the ringing of bells inside me.
First we have to tackle passport control. there’s nothing like being an orderly crowd and trust me, this was nothing like an orderly crowd. Push and shove to the front, oh and if your late and your flight’s about to leave, don’t try to politely get to the front, if the officials don’t tell you to get to the back, the other passengers will, even if they have all the time in the world.
It seemed to work for me as well as talking about how I was feeling to my Dad and to Sarah, the worse part was trying to explain to the boys why I was feeling the way I was but they are resilient and seemed happy to go off and play and be boys that it wasn't so bad (I hope).
wah wah wah.
But swapping the Hollywood Hills for the Highlands of Scotland doesn’t
When someone asks me where to go, I usually first ask, “Well, what do you like to do?”
One argument I sort of forgot to tackle was when some people say, “One simply cannot know that a god does not exist. One can only have faith that a god does not exist,” or that I do not know X, that I only have faith in X, whatever X may be. These arguments do not come from theists; they come from fellow atheists (I’m serious).
Onto the log!
After I removed the stencil from the background, I decided that the overspray made a nice frame, so I added a little more color and cut about 1/4” away from the stencil border. The yellow card I used for a background isn’t really that bright, I don’t know why it scanned that way, the rest of the colors are about right. It’s closer to the shade of the yellow on the lighthouse lamp.
Patchwork.
When you flew away
Listen and feel! The breath relaxes and as you watch inhalation meeting exhalation, and exhalation meeting inhalation, the awareness deepens of itself as mind and body slow down, as the frequency of little self melts into the resonance of the Earth Mother. Upon the back of Turtle Medicine you ride, floating so easily, so quietly. Can you feel the hard shell, smooth and worn. When you touch the shell of Turtle you are connecting with the ancient memories of the Great Mystery!
Finally, in case you’re wondering, my next Time Team will be in two weeks. And it won’t be prehistoric. In fact it won’t be very old at all. But I suspect it’ll be extraordinarily moving, in much the same way as that remarkable rain-swept navvy camp up in the clouds atop Risehill, in the Yorkshire Dales. Our next site is also a camp, but a very, very large one. And a very different one. Your appetite whetted?
She loved it. There was something there, she didn’t know exactly what, that made her decide to return the following evening. Perhaps it was the music, or the way the message was spoken or maybe even the strange way they prayed at the end that drew her. Whatever it was, her mind was set: she’d be back.
Children will be taught biology through a creationist wary college. Dumbing down and bastardising the science until it is no longer recognisable, simply to get one point across.
According to several bloggers the world is going to end this Saturday. To celebrate here is a repost looking at the ways Hollywood thinks we will cark it.
Despite her success, Warner Brothers continued to offer Bette unsatisfactory roles. In 1936, she challenged the studio by going to England to make pictures. Jack Warner sued her, and she was forced to honor her contract. Upon her return, however, Bette was offered a new contract and better roles. In 1939, Bette won her second Oscar for "Jezebel" (1938). She also received Oscar nominations the next five years in a row.
Psst: We've tried Carls jr and decided that we'd rather eat Mc Donalds ;p (based on our experience: the service is really slow and the burger is so-so, compared to other burgers from other brands/resto).
Yeah, I'm not dead. My last post was rather ominous...Good news: I was not hijacked by Somali pirates or held for ransom in London. Bad news: I can't help you with your penile enlargements or help you scrub your credit score in 15 days or less....
I got home, watched a laconic Aussie called Ash win Professional Masterchef and decided to write about the cheapest way I know of cooking something nice.
Being inspired by all the great talent and ideas out there
invisible man
The Richmond Turnpike traveling through Tompkinsville, the town founded by Vice President Daniel D. Tompkins. The Turnpike, formerly a toll road and the basis of the Richmond Turnpike Company, would be renamed Victory Boulevard after World War I.
Obviously it was at this point that the coordinator wanted an explanation for our morning exercise routine.
Apparently I always thought that since I make banana bread all the time, I already had the recipe up here. Ahhhhh, not so much. The good news for me is that I got the banana bread made for my PTO meeting. The good news for you? I'm finally posting the recipe. (That is good news, right?)
But it is unlikely that he will succeed altogether. By God's grace, the couple have already chosen to get married in a building consecrated for the purposes of Christian worship.
Now I’m pleased to say Radio Allerton is stronger than ever, providing live broadcasts every weekday evening. In 2006, the station merged with Radio Skeba from Seacroft Hospital, following which a play-out system was installed – enabling us to broadcast 24 hours a day.
- Easily switch between drawing and erasing (as well as pausing and playing) to make your ShowMe flow from concept to concept
calls the following code:
“This Path cannot be mastered due to only the desire and individual efforts of anyone. It may be done by no other way than with the help of the Holy Spirits.
for more than a quarter of a century now and have been an observer of the difficult and fascinating process of the continuing development of German identity during this period. If there can be one lesson learnt from the current Grass controversy it is that even today, 67 years after the liberation of the concentration camps and the end of the war, it is still difficult to have a “normal” dialogue in Germany regarding the complex themes of Germany, Judaism, the Shoah and Israel. There has been little
Rupert Everett (My Best Friend’s Wedding)
In the newer bibles it is called the Tower of Babel and was built on the flat plains of Shinar (again, why build a Tower to Heaven on flat land, surely, you’d start on a mountain)
How to get there: Dr Beeching made this area quite difficult to access by railway, but there are still direct services from London, and a number of heritage steam railways locally too. Both stations are on the Uckfield line, served by an hourly Southern service from London Bridge via East Croydon. Alternatively, travel from London Victoria on the service to East Grinstead and change at Hurst Green or Oxted. NB: There’s an Ashurst station in the New Forest. Don’t go there. At least, not if you want to do this walk.
What if, instead of war,
There could be up to 120,000 offspring over a seven-year period from one pair of fertile cats, Williams said.
He expands on how to apply this rule on the continuum of soft magic to hard magic, just like in SF there is the continuum of soft science to hard science. He uses Spiderman, Gandalf, and Harry Potter as specific examples but also mentions several authors who have approached magic in ways differently from himself, yet he still enjoys reading their stories.
08. Not that kind - Anastacia / 3:21
Length : 33.5"
But a number of organisations have come to Mr Turton's support.
'Of course, are you ok? Did something happen?'
Waterloo High School, the Class of 2007, and the Waterloo Bulldogs football team honored Chris throughout the 2006-2007 school year. The Bulldogs wore Chris’ #50 on our helmets and Chris was buried wearing his black home jersey. His mother, Cheryl, wore his white #50 throughout the entire season.
This is how you make a man cry:
Handles: 1/3 yard accent fabric (mine is blue)
jocelynnhsu
for me.
NO LIGHT.
_____I hate discrimination. That's why I hate everyone equally. (funny discrimination quote)
David Silva has indicated he would like to stay at Manchester City beyond the two years remaining on his current deal though the playmaker is focusing on helping the club win a first title since 1968.
You are now lying in the soil of a friendly country.
but this peice is actually quite large.
Book you've learned the most from: Bible
Thanks, Tim!
"Do you have an appointment?”
Setlist
Bo Derek (Tommy Boy)
A small room off the kitchen served as the record company office. It was a company run when they weren't at their day jobs, practicing with their bands in the basement, or on tour. There was a lot of work to be done. At this time, the 7" sleeves were hand cut and pasted together, there was no company budget to speak of; things moved slowly.
He looked so lonely and sad. It's like he just... wilted.
It's just part of it. Something my sibbies will understand more someday..
I asked a question I'd been mulling since taking this overnight position and hearing gloomy stories of the depth of this recession. Were there people in the department preparing for a crime wave?
After dipping the dough into the baking soda solution, place on a towel to soak up the bottom side of the dough. Then place the pretzel on a greased cookie sheet, reshape pretzel if needed. Let the pretzels sit on the cookie sheet for twenty minutes before putting in the oven. Sprinkle dough with salt if desired, before baking.
And, the work in progress is the story mentioned in the last post; it has a new title – WIP. I’ve ripped it a new shape and back again so now there is some kind of justification in its present state and I know what I have to do to move it forward. There’s a very bad man in it and I love writing crazy with him, I just have to get on with it now. It stands at around 20,000 words and is in three sections so here I go one voice at a time.
That is also why the church, for our benefit, provides the sacraments of Reconciliation and Eucharist continuously in our times, so that He can energize our faith in His Victory and thus manifest that Victory in our daily Lives. In this way, as we proceed along life’s treacherous path we may always have access to the Graces of Christ’s Eternal Cross and Resurrection and His Eternal Redemption, permitting us to proclaim and manifest Our Lord’s victory over death and sin through our redeemed lives and our empowered witness.
It has become popular in pop-psychology to blame the parents for the child’s issues. Too much mommy, not enough daddy. Too much discipline, not enough love. Never breastfed, never hugged, never came to my Little League games. On and on it goes until we have absolved the individual of any real responsibility for any decision they have ever made and reduced the identity of the individual to the sum of the upbringing, environment, and genetics. Encouraging right? How is your esteem now?
One example we're all familiar with is Palestine. Neither side is willing to share the city. Each feels that if they don't win complete control of the geography, they've lost.
The semester is coming to an end, so you may be starting to look for some fun summer activities. Look no further! CRI has plenty of activities for you to choose from this summer.
He believes a zombie was the killer.
Homemade rolls
I have hope, I have my God, and I have new memories to make with my beautiful family. I won’t let the past hold me back from those things. and I am joy-filled to have some heritage from my dad to pass down through the generations. His love for God. My love for God. and most importantly God’s love for us.
5 beets, scrubbed
The van pulls up and out steps tall, dark and handsome, sporting tattoos and a couple piercing. Becca's friends were all bookish types. They wore polos and khakis and played on their church worship teams. This guy? This guy was NOT what I pictured.
A typical outfit for Cooper. He is really into dressing himself these days. He told me he wanted to wear his airplane shirt so he put it on. Since it was backwards and he couldn't see the planes on the front of the shirt I asked him where the planes went and he said "they flew away!" I thought that was a pretty good answer.
The song seemed to be very popular with people in the know about reggae in the 80's but did it get airplay beyond college radio reggae shows?
To me, this was your typical Fall seasonal brew. Dark brown color with a sweet toasty caramel smell.
Paper: Whisper White, Riding Hood Red, Retired DSP
Let’s look at the facts: children have a strong image of the Father Christmas/Santa Claus being. There are pictures, films and songs of him. He turns up at school and/or in shops. They write letters to him. There is a mythos surrounding his story, paraphernalia and methods. But most of all: on Christmas morning, presents turn up, just as they have been promised.
This image is called "Katie Computer Gal"
And quenching chills. But with this ice we’re curst.
1/4 cup freshly grated parmigiano reggiano
Due to the wealth of all three of the murder victims, and the anti-terrorism work of the victim from Los Alamos, all kinds of police investigators and FBI agents are called in. Naturally, they don’t have a clue about whodunit, but Axel Crowe starts figur­ing it out after 300 pages or so. His first insight comes from noticing a variety of threes and triangle shapes during his investigation. The trail is interrupted by some violence, a few sex scenes, and a tangled narration that jumps from one location to the other every few pages.
The day proceeded with a more than entertaining bus tour of the city, both its good parts and bad, and ultimately concluded (or so we thought), with a fantastic dinner at Café Reconcile. Café Reconcile is yet another inspiring story inside New Orleans, of which I would encourage everyone to click on the preceding link to learn more about the endeavor. After a pretty fantastic serving of the Café’s award winning banana foster bread pudding to finish up the meal, Chris packed up most of the crew for a trip to Snug Harbor, where we ended the night with a great jazz set, before hitting the hotel to ramp up for a new day...
I am going to approach this challenge with an open mind and with a sense of fun. I hope to not over think my art and revel in childish spontaneity and self-discovery.
I decided to "distress" the image on my nephew's; he just turned 8 and I wanted his to look a little more hip. Do people even say hip anymore?
His imagination is like wandering through a wild wood--full of shadow and light. The question is how to nuture the infinite possibilities of that mind without letting all the boogeymen slip in? Apparently there are rules to follow. Like a red cotton ribbon can actually keep the scaries from sneaking out of the closet when it is draped over both door handles. Who knew?
They say the way to a man's heart is through is stomach. I am not sure if this is true but I do know that the boys in my house ask for these waffles every single time we are going to have a family breakfast.
My husband asked me this question on Cece’s birthday as we were sitting quietly at the cemetery. What do I miss most? The only answer that I could say was everything.
It occurred to me yesterday while sitting in the pews at Sunday Mass and looking out upon the congregation of old people, middle aged people and young people, that those young mothers who are pregnant or nursing a baby or carrying a toddler on a hip, have given God their youth and their beauty too. When the culture tells us to look a certain way or to live a certain way, those who sacrifice their youth and their beauty in order to bring forth new life into the world are doing something heroic and they're sacrificing their figures, their restful nights and their energetic youth holding crying babies in the back of church or consoling a cranky toddler or trying to teach a young child to be prayerful and attentive at Mass.
I wonder what would have happened if that nice lady wasn’t there. I wonder if Bear would have come to my rescue or would he just be confused too. I’m pretty sure I would put up a pretty good fight coz I don’t really like strangers picking me up for no good reason, but it wouldn’t be good for me to run around the parking lot or the street all by myself.
Merrell: Yo mama.
I then got a call for a domestic in progress. A male and a female fighting as they were walking across a bridge.It was called in via cell phone by a passerby. We were in the area and the other cop came with me as backup, we found and went off a couple fitting the description, they were arguing loudly but not actively fighting when we saw them.
I love both of these women.
Well, I got off to a great start. I realized I did have pumpkin, in the can, and didn't want to waste it. Since I only use the larger cans of pumpkin when I make pumpkin pies the little can simply wasn't of much use, especially since I rarely make stews and summer is upon us anyway (and I never did quite got cold soups and stews even attempted). So, the cats got half a teaspoon in their wet food. Neither favors it much. Sassy usually eats her food and whatever Sam leaves. Today she didn't eat more than half of her own food. Well, I put up the dry. They can eat that or nothing. The Lord moves in mysterious ways, like turning a son into his mother? Bah! It didn't work for her, probably won't work for me, but she always figured something out to... get the intent down. I will too. Women! ??? Ha! I even found a container to store the remnants of the can in. If it doesn't pass the smell test next time I go to use it I'll toss it.
But she did not tell me how to fix everything you lost
In the 1947 flood
Over the years, Aquatic Lab has found a comfortable niche inside the record bags of essential tastemakers such as Youngsta, N-Type, Skream, Mala, Benga, Joe Nice and Chef. Most notably, Seven’s releases for the label (LAB004 and LAB005) were exclusively spun by Youngsta as Aquatic Lab dubplates for over a year before their release; and they would eventually come to define the techy-halfstep that is the ‘Youngsta sound’. The subsequent strength of Aquatic Lab’s output has meant this globally-recognised label has sold thousands of records around the world.
So, my aversion to all of Johnson County is no secret right? I may have made passing mention of it once or twice? Yeah, that's what I thought.
October is usually a pretty busy month for me, a lot of birthdays, including my own. I have had something going on every weekend this month I believe. I went to the state fair for the first time...I think I would appreciate more the novelty of a small town fair. It was crowded and I got blisters. I went to a family reunion last weekend...I made it a majority of one of the days before I got "well, you still depriving a young man of your companionship?" I guess I was surprised no one pressed the issue sooner and I guess I should be grateful they said "young man", unless they expect me to marry younger. I guess with my last birthday I am approaching the time of my life that that will be a constant "concern" on the part of those around me. I also managed to be the only girl at the reunion watching the Ranger game (the 2nd game of the series), didn't "single" myself out there!
The Orchard was planted entirely by local people in 1998, and is looked after by the city council's park rangers and local volunteers. The animals featuring on the ornate gates were designed and painted by local schoolchildren. In season, you can pick raspberries, plums, apples or gooseberries, or at any time of year just enjoy the peace and the birdsong.
Otherwise, you can access it here. And now, to my giveaway! So that Irini can tell her bag apart from everyone else's (since they have a "school" school bag) I made her, Stephen and their cousin a cute little bag tag.
With elegance and grace
A couple of days later, we stuffed our pockets, hit the town, and stuck our little friends in fun places.
I wanted to have an authentic Japanese new year as possible, so my friend and I watched Kouhaku (Red and White), a variety music program that's on every 31st of December. The colours represent two teams of performers, and at the end there's a vote to decide which team did the best. The team leaders/presenters were Arashi for the white team and a very pretty actress for the red team, with performances by Kouda Kumi, Wada Akiko (who seemed to be on Japanese television for the whole of my two-week stay), EXILE, Lady Gaga, AKB48, a lot of enka singers and of course SMAP. And lots more besides!
Prod egg(s) with wooden spatula to prevent sticking.
(Sorry, but a little cussing is allowed here)
The next best option would have been what usually happens in this type of scenario: Driver is embarrassed by own incompetence, puts head down, and hightails it away hoping no eye contact will happen.
Thanks again everyone for making my birthday SO dang special. It just makes me smile!
Sergio Asti
Great, solid smell to it. Lots of roasted grain, but also something sweet. Almost like a milk stout. Maybe a Snicker bar. (I might be a little drunk already.)
*Jeff bursts into tears*
When you hear a name like Busy Phillipps, you think it's kind of a joke or a pornstar name. It's not. We are not sure who made this gown but it does look busy. So much going on, and we are not amused. The only redeeming factor is the colour. Bless.
make
When the sad day comes and The Queen passes on, Charles will become King of the 16 Commonwealth Realms immediately. Sorry, no time to debate and change the constitution in that brief second of transition.
Now, as a fiery passion flares between Alana and the man who has wrongly imprisoned her, the fate of a nation rests in their hands and on their hearts.
Aliette: ha ha ha. I once had someone (non-Vietnamese) argue with me about how I’d got Vietnamese history all wrong because it was in the (American) history books. I’m much less pacifist than you, and I basically fought an urge to strangle the person at that point…
Possibly a good beer for gaming, tastes good but not punchy as to distract from what you are doing. In fact it is this style of beer that I miss seeing in London, hoppy beers are the norm and whilst I don't mind hoppy beers I prefer miles and stouts. I know that not everyone does but the middle ground to me of bitters is now a thin line, I would like to see at least one beers like this on a bar. Even Brewdog does Blitz which whilst hoppy had a lovely malty biscuit bite too.
After what I can only assume is the worst night of sleep in my entire life (the air mattress I slept on collapsed under my burly weight), I awoke around 8 AM and felt the curious sensation of having a deflated balloon attached to the roof of my mouth. I swallowed once and felt a large flap of something undulating in my throat. My first inclination was to assume William and Javen had played a mischievous prank on me by placing something in my mouth as I slept, and I briefly looked forward to the sure-to-follow digital photo documenting the hilarity at my expense. But when I realized everyone else was still comatose, I flipped the hell out.
And they which were sent were of the Pharisees. And they asked him, and said unto him, Why baptizest thou then, if thou be not that Christ, nor Elias, neither that prophet? John answered them, saying, I baptize with water: but there standeth one among you, whom ye know not; He it is, who coming after me is preferred before me, whose shoe’s latchet I am not worthy to unloose. These things were done in Bethabara beyond Jordan, where John was baptizing.
I’ll never forget that day, or everything he did for us, for as long as I live. That kind, generous old man completely restored my faith in mankind and gave me a reason to keep meeting life’s challenges with my head held high.
Looking around nervously as things got moved about with some Vigour.
The result was a blockbuster thriller that unexpectedly caught the popular imagination. Despite the fact that at least two other previous thrillers, The Da Vinci Legacy by Lewis Perdue (1983), and Kingdom Come (2000) by Jim Hougan, had overlapped much of the same territory, lightning struck Brown’s novel and sparked innumerable dinner-table discussions of heretofore-arcane topics such as Mary Magdalene’s real relationship to Jesus.
Prosperity plays on the platter of platinum,
Escapism, that’s what it is. I don’t want to face reality. Me, sitting here by myself in my room whilst everyone is out having fun with their families. I am isolated. I spoke to my sister who lives in the same city as me and we were talking about what to do on this national holiday. She said it was too difficult to go and do a BBQ in the park because she has 2 babies, I understand that. So, I decided to stay at the rehabilitation program’s housing. There (was) 6 guys outside doing a BBQ, but no girls were there. They all went to be with their families and 2 girls went to the beach together. I didn’t particularly want to go out with 6 guys there.
In the meantime, Mrs. Miracle has come to work in the toy department of Findleys, bring them all together, and save Christmas!
Carrie Ann: I’m working on FOUR right now. But next up in terms of release, is Dust of My Wings. It’s a the first book in a new series called Dante’s Circle. I’m loving this because I get to work with angels!!!
HootSuite
Zoilo Versalles doesn't look to happy about it either.
The member for Silvertown believes that if beer is not the backbone of the British nation it at least helps to support the backbones of those who are obliged to bend them continuously during an eight-hour day. "It makes you pretty tired," he said, "to hear people who pride themselves on doing brain work trying to rob the working men of his beer. Most of these people haven't any brains to work, and if you asked them to do a hard days physical labour you would find that they hadn't any bodies worth mentioning. "Good beer," concluded Mr. Jones, "is essential to the manual worker."
Well inflation has ruined that hilarious phrase for me.
I knew about this beforehand, and made a mental note to pay attention to it, but didn’t notice it until they were all two panels per page. And that’s only because the 2nd and 3rd pages are a weird kind of 3/4-splash that caught my eye. It was very subtle. I remember reading just the “death of” issue soon after it came out, but I didn’t recall the splash pages.
Great story, or at least pretty good. Bringing in Loki was a solid choice because Thor is the outlier here. What’s his realm of magic doing in a world of hi-tech spies and flying ships and computers like you wouldn’t believe? So you start by dealing with that. Make it central. And then everyone believes in it.
Start/Finish: Manningtree Station TM094322
I've been hinting to my husband that we need to go to Maine, but he's not really good at picking up hints of things he's not particularly interested in (strange, what husband doesn't want to be trapped in the boonies with in-laws he's never met?). So when my parents told me they were heading up, I got a wild hair and booked a flight. Just me, a couple of days, during the week, Sky-Mile-ing-it.
DuClaw -Devil's Milk Bourbon-Aged Porter
and sorcery – a group of varied individuals band together to save their city. There are monsters of various sorts that need to be destroyed, there’s politics and fermenting revolution in the city, there is magic, and there is ancient evil to be stopped. The group has its internal differences, whether religious, age or nationality yet still work together to get the job done as each one brings an important talent to the mix. And the evil is mysterious and more powerful than any of them have faced before – as I hinted at above, it’s a
My Favorite Television Memory Of All Time: Watching Keith Foulke flip the ball to Doug Mientkiewicz for the last out of the 2004 World Series, which isn’t strictly a “TV” memory, I suppose. So, there’s this scene in one episode of Justice League where The Flash starts racing around the world. As he’s speeding around the planet, he keeps hitting Lex Luthor (who had merged with Brainiac). Each punch is an incredible blow, stunning Luthor. He eventually knocks him out and Flash is standing there, crackling with all of this energy. Amazing scene, especially for a fan of The Flash.
I am dustin off this dusty ol blog... June 5th??? REALLY??? Oh My how time flies... it's been THAT long since my last post...
- White cardstock
Each time, Jesus corrected their thinking, but he didn’t fire them. Amazingly, he sent out seventy-two more followers for another round of teaching and healing. And these disciples had not had nearly the amount of face time with Jesus as the Twelve. How spiritually mature do you suppose they were?
And then what about the changes we make to keep something else from not changing. This is a two edge sword. For example, spouses (or in my case spousal equivalents). People change, relationships change, so what if we want to keep the spouse we have? We have to change with the person and the relationship to keep the relationship with this person. Our children change as they grow and mature. We, as parents have to change our parenting skills to adapt and help our children as they change. Parenting is a life long endeavor. The dynamics of parenting changes over time, however, we’re still parents.
In Philippians 2:1-5, I find my statement of practice—a radical summary of how I believe I should live the Christian life through Christ, like Christ, and for Christ as I serve others.
so they should turn the body inside out
I don’t usually make to-do lists. This isn’t exactly one, either. It’s just a list of things that I need to do.
Affinity and Fingersmith - Sarah Waters.
I made the holder to fit a 3" square Post It Note pad.
Another nice weekend in Austin. This time I came up to visit with my wonderful (but slightly misanthropic), adorable (yet occasionally menacing) friend and former roommate Carole and her sister. Both now reside elsewhere and it had been a while since they'd been back to Austin. I didn't join them for the requisite trip to Toy Joy and Momoko, but I did attend the night swim at Barton Springs. Sure the water is 68 degrees but if you just start swimming, the exertion keeps you warm. Getting out is mildly uncomfortable, though I find that vigorous towelling and thoughts of perhaps going to Kirby or Magnolia for pancakes soon resolves the shivering and goosebumps.
Paper--SU (base, pumpkin pie, leaves, dsp), M&MBI(leaves), The Paper Co.(card front and sentiment strip)
The one without a title.
And talking about sheep and what they give to us, do try some Livno or Kupres cheese, tasty as can be and cheaper than the industry-stuff you may be used to.
We tried to count up how many times we have been to Disney World. Somehow we came up with the number eight (with kids). We usually go every couple of years because of a meeting or conference that Art has.
collects the words and assembles a window
We are still working through the list of recipes chosen by my kids from some of my healthy eating resources. This was one of the kids' favorites so far. From Martha Stewart Everyday (Jan/Feb 2011 issue - "the light issue"), are the mini cheeseburgers with oven fries. What's not to like, right?
It is also worth noting that:
While Sorgi’s numbers indicate better (safer) quarterback play, he doesn’t have nearly the sample size. Leinart has vital starting experience, and already has experience in the Gregg Knapp system. Both guys are check-down artists (Leinart: 6.5 ypa, Sorgi: 5.96 ypa) and should not actually see the field. Should Carson Palmer experience an injury (knock on wood), either guy would be a better option in reserve than what is currently on the Raiders’ roster. Leinart seems to be a slightly better option, but what do you think?
The Rangers scored three unanswered goals in the third period.
I have done my absolute best to refrain from commenting on the constitutional amendment on the ballot in North Carolina. Trust me when I say that it’s been hard.
I have no idea why its even out on the sink.
Høybråten (AP) Prime Minister Jens Stoltenberg was among those who threw dirt on the coffin of Mona Abdinur the funeral of Høybråten today.
The romance that started to bloom between Lydia and Walker was sweet and that definitely added to the story. There was one surprise regarding Lydia that I did NOT see coming... if you read the book, I'm pretty sure you'll know what I'm talking about.
Whether you’re a boating beauty or a land lover, the sailing capital of the US has plenty to catch your eye. Colonial buildings, wine tasting, gourmet dining: with a stay so perfect and carefree, you’ll feel like you’re living in a Ralph Lauren ad.
7In him we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of sins, in accordance with the riches of God’s grace 8that he lavished on us with all wisdom and understanding.
Hopshead, signing out.
After he'd gone, somebody said "he'll be richer than God, I suppose". Since he co-wrote "I'm Not In Love" , "The Wall Street Shuffle", "Art For Art's Sake" , "The Things We Do For Love", "Dreadlock Holiday" for them and the likes of "Heartful Of Soul" for The Yardbirds and "Bus Stop" for The Hollies it seemed reasonable to suspect that his PRS cheques alone would make interesting reading.
Well, I have delivered 2 of the baby quilts. Both of the showers were great and the Mommy's to be loved the quilts! Unfortunately, I don't have a good picture of the one with the drums. Mine are all blurry, so I am waiting for my niece's husband to send me one.... he is a fabulous photographer. The third baby quilt is all done, except for the binding. She isn't due for another couple of weeks, so I have time to get that done.
It took over twenty years, then five or six dates, and maybe thirty phone calls and dozens of quite charmingly-written emails before L returned a kiss with any enthusiasm. It took a little longer before she gave more.
The announcement of the bank’s closure in Dateline also included the following two paragraphs:
3 warmth
(the dutch epuivalent of Corky (the mentally challenged actor)) (vegan
Altantuya, a lover of Abdul Razak and spoke fluent French, was believed to be an interpreter during the submarine deal.
I just had to do something to feel warmer, so I looked through some of our beach pictures. Betsy and I visit the beach in North Carolina just about every year. The picture above was taken at Sunset Beach, North Carolina. One nice thing about going to the beach in May is that we often have it to ourselves.
The bible tells us about men and women who had such dreams… Abraham and Sarah, Joseph, Moses, Ruth, David… men and women who felt this pulse of a deep and powerful purpose and followed it all the way. They were just like us, with kids and jobs and responsibilities, they must have struggled with the irrational sense of just launching out of their comfortable lives to follow this inner cry, this dream they had.
The inside of my purse looks similar to the inside of my house, neat and tidy, with minimal clutter.
Here is probably the easiest way you can help a child in need have a happier holiday this season. Head on over to the Growing Tree Toys Facebook page and click the "Like" button. Your click equals $1 to Toys for Tots! You'll also be entered to win a $500 shopping spree!
to her darling Mason jar lid ornaments, this girl has it going on.
Perspective is everything, really. It was good. For sure. But safe? Well, not really.
Theme: Pasta
When we play with stars, and fly in the skies,
This is one of the most tragic events I have written about since establishing End the Lieover eight months ago: the horrendous bill that would turn all of America into a battlefield and subject American citizens to indefinite military detention without charge or trial has passed the Senate.To make matters even worse, only seven of our so-called representatives voted against the bill, proving once and for all (if anyone had any doubt remaining) that our government does not work for us in any way, shape, or form.
Results of the research, which was supported by the U.S. Geological Survey, the U.S. Forest Service and Oregon State University, have been published online in Geophysical Research Letters.
Bell said 18-storey buildings shouldn’t be permitted “without any identifiable community benefit.”
A couple other thoughts of mine regarding this.
As one of my wise and wonderful neighbours, Prabha laughingly said to me, “say, ‘we are like this only’ “!
Now, the mind-blowing point to ponder here is, what if technological advance did not speed up time? Imagine that the time lapse between our discovery of how to spark a fire and our ability to harness that fire in an oven (probably hundreds of thousands of years) also applied to our understanding of wave technologies as we moved from radio to television. Now imagine what it would mean for the same concept to have applied to every single technological advance in our history.
After a long stalemate, parties agreed in early November 2011 to integrate a maximum of 6,500 combatants in a specially created directorate under the NA. Subsequently, the former fighters were categorised into three groups after a detailed interview process. Around 9,000 of them opted for integration, and the rest chose to voluntarily retire with cash incentives. Only a handful picked rehabilitation packages. In early February, those who opted for retirement left the cantonments.
Use at least one of the following elements:
Apparently, candy corn is an outdated Halloween treat and many people don't think it should still be around.
You promised me everything, you promised me thick and thin, yeah!
and then evaporates and is gone.
One M&T Plaza - Main Street between Eagle & North Division
Now here are the winners of the Artist's Choice Award from January's challenge. Winners, please grab your winner's trophy button from the right side bar and display it on your blog! (Please forgive the lack of pics this month as we are resetting our inlinkz).
Was it your seductive love parlance that shred me to husks
Then Pilgrim has to establish the connection between themselves and him and give glowly ‘testimony’ to the character of HO, pulling the attention away from HO and directly onto the siblings by inferring that only HO is a lady and is trying to make a difference. To make a difference is language of Joan Wheeler (I am using JW from now on) doing nothing other than meddling in her life and trying to destroy her mentally, professionally, and physically for over 30 YEARS! this is word for word JW! Because halforphan56 wrote a book about her life as she lived it. This is word for word JW! The rest of the paragraph are recent thoughts that Joan has begun to use since the book has been pulled, but keeps bringing the attention BACK to Joan by the words she was often as hard on herself, this is somehow to give us the impression that it is someone else speaking!
We went to go and visit my brother and his wife in East Atlanta, we went out ot eat that night.
Speaking of firing people, it seems that Howard was lobbying management to fire his coach, Stan Van Gundy. In a very odd chain of events, Van Gundy was speaking to reporters during a recent Magic practice, when he stated that he was told by Magic upper management Howard wanted him out as coach. Apparently, Howard must have heard some of the discussion because he felt it necessary to interrupt the media session which seemed to irk Van Gundy who excused himself.
Rating 9/10
joojie.
It can stand on its own or be hung on the wall, and to my eye it is perfect for displaying some of my jewelry in the gallery this summer. (Yes, I am planning to open my gallery again to sell my work and that of a couple of others.)
The same source, in a separate entry, says that only crude faulty parallelisms usually bother us: “we speak and write a good many more that go unnoticed.” Unless we have that “craving” Garner mentions, I suppose, along with a meticulous reading and listening style.
Our second entrance in as many days through the doorway of the farmhouse proved to be a lot more ordinary than my imagination had fancied it might be, and the notion that someone may have actually taken up residence in that ramshackle pile of sticks was quickly put to rest on second look at the conditions of the old house, and the likeliness that anyone attempting to climb up the flight of stairs leading to the attic would most likely crash through the rotted wood and break a leg, or worse. We stood listening in silence for what seemed like an eternity but what was most likely a few minutes. Nothing, no sounds except for the occasional crack of the old blackened wood settling. We decided that since we had come this far, we were damned if we were going to leave without a good and thorough search and so we set about the task of figuring out a way to ascend the steps leading to the attic.
Sleep: Getting soooo much better!
It looks like a lot of new gluten free/allergy free/organic product.
We must consider the mysteries set forth in the text with the clearer eye of the understanding; for the saying has a deep meaning, and puts before us in its completeness, so to speak, the significance of the Incarnation. For He assures us that He Himself was loved by God the Father, and that He so loved us in turn, after the same manner, that is, according to which He Himself considered that He was loved by His own Father. What charge then did He lay upon them? That it is our duty to abide in His love. But He gives, as it were, an explanation and most convincing reason of His being with justice loved by the Father, namely, the keeping of His commandments; and exhorts us, too, to hasten to fulfil this, and thus, He says, to remain in His love. We have clearly shown what His meaning is then, summing up and condensing into small compass the sense of the passage, so far as possible. But since I think it right to rob of its terrors that which is likely sometimes to disturb in no small degree the mind of the pure, come, let us say how and in what way we apprehend the meaning of the passage. Our Lord Jesus Christ then appears, setting Himself forth as a type and pattern of the holy state of life, and as being on this account under the Law, and not disdaining to take the measure of our poverty, in order that designedly moulding Himself, according to His plan, into conformity with our dispositions, He might be found as in figures to those that are His, a guide of the way to our recovery of a state and of a life strange to us and wholly untrodden. We must now inquire then what commandment of the Father He has kept, and in what way, or in what manner He is said to have been loved by Him. Let then the most wise Paul come to our aid, and initiate us into |395 the mystery by his words concerning Him; how being in the form of God, He emptied Himself, taking the form of a servant, being made in the likeness of men; and being found in fashion as a man, He hath humbled Himself, becoming obedient even unto death; yea, the death of the cross. Wherefore also God highly exalted Him, and gave unto Him the Name which is above every name. You have heard how, though He was the true God, seeing that He was of the same fashion with His Father, He humbled Himself, becoming obedient unto death. For when God determined to save the corrupted race upon the earth, and it did not satisfy justice that any created being should accomplish this, the Only-begotten God, Who knows the Will of God the Father, Himself undertook the task, as the enterprise exceeded all the power that there was in the world. And thus He came down to a voluntary subjection, so as even to descend to death, and that a most shameful one. For how could the being nailed to a cross be honourable, and how would it not rather pass every disgrace? Since therefore He endured these things, God hath highly exalted Him. You have therefore in His willing obedience the fulfilment of the purposes of the Father; which purposes, the Son says, were ranked by Him as commands. For understanding as Word the counsels in the Father, and searching out the secret thoughts of Him that begat Him, nay rather being Himself the Wisdom and the Power of the Father, He realises His plan, accounting it as a command, and thus naming it after a human analogy. And see herein the measure of His love. For God hath highly exalted Him, He says. He exalts and glorifies Him that was already exalted and glorified; although He is by nature very God; inasmuch as He does not exist as one of the creatures, according to the identity of His Substance, on this account being deemed, and being in reality, beyond all height that is conceived, and even the Lord of Glory,according to the holy writings. But of a truth, He says, |396 He is exalted and glorified; how, or when, and in what way? When of course, He was in the form of a servant and in the likeness of our humiliation; that is, man like ourselves. For He returns clothed with our flesh to be again highly exalted and glorified with the Father. And He was loved by Him, and not then for the first time, when He fulfilled His voluntary subjection; and you will better understand this by the following considerations. For according to the manner in which He was always exalted and glorified, with reference to His Own Nature, He that was bereft of the glory suited to God, so far as the definition of His Humanity was concerned, is said to have been glorified and exalted when He became Man. For being thus from the beginning loved always and through all time, He is said to have been loved even when clothed in flesh. For on this account He appeared amongst us; that is, He took our form upon Him and became Man, in order that He might make pleasing to God that which was hated on account of the transgression at the beginning, and the sin which had crept in in the interval. For, for this reason, Christ is said to have appeared as the Door, and the Beginning, and the Way of all things good to us. Does He then tell you that He has been loved without reproach, because His Father’s commands have been kept by Him? Did not the declaration of the mystery seem difficult to you, and was not the deep meaning of the Incarnation accomplished in our behalf hardly attainable by your reason? But they are all plain to him that understandeth, and right to them that find knowledge.
Please please comment on this post AND e-mail me at christina4062@hotmail.com by Friday so I can send you your free set of flippy books! I'd love it if you would leave a happy post on your blog too! :)
9/28 Berkeley, CA- Greek Theater
This is a very fine Imperial Stout. Smells of chocolate, bourbon, coffee and malt. Pours a very thin dark chocolate color with a slight off white head. It taste's exactly like it smells -- which is to my liking. Love chocolate and coffee but the bourbon flavor is very subtle and can be easily missed, a nice change up for me.
I had heard about Aubrey organics through the youtube beauty community and decided to give it a try.
There are none so blind as.....Stevie Wonder.
Heaven help you if you’re ever south of me when I’m behind the wheel of a car. I’ll go 30 km/h in an 80 km/h zone and you can be sure I won’t be in the curb lane. Nothing but slow moving in the fast lane for this little, ol’ lady from past-her-prima. And don’t even bother honking or giving me the finger. I’m old. I can’t hear. My eyesight is suspect. That’s why I use two spaces when I park and still manage to ding the side of your car with my shopping cart.
The economy that needs to be tackled to impact positively on the
Unfortunate.
So I plan to be back in the saddle roughly two weeks after Adepticon. By then I'll be in new living quarters, with ample time to devote to the hobby bench. The Fire Hawks, WAAAGH Teek, The Blindwater Congregation, and my burgeoning KoB fleet for Dystopian Wars should all start seeing new life and new paint.
So family and friends, I would love for volunteers to pick a letter and spend the next... year, 9 months, whatever it ends up being, working on a letter for us. If you happen to want to pick the letter that your name starts with, even cooler.
Sorry to have to tell you by email but I don’t want you doing anything else on the cock sticker campaign. As much as I appreciate the other comedians turning out for the photocalls that you organised, I didn’t want to be in the photos and you convinced me against my better judgement that it would be a good idea. I’ve seen the resulting photos and I look more awkward than Jade Goody’s mum on a juggling course. Also I’m getting grief off my bird after you made me put that sticker on Kate Copstick’s jumper and some cunt took that photo which is now doing the rounds that looks like I’m titting her up.
I assure you that the poor have no wish for anarchy or the imposition of some stringent biblical reconstruction. They merely wish to enjoy those essential things we all aspire to: a full belly, a comfortable home and freedom from financial worry.
On the run and hunted by enemy soldiers, Jeniah must place her life and the fate of her kingdom in the hands of this trained killer. Torn between embracing her destiny as queen of Arden, and her love for a mere knight, she must ultimately rely on her magic to save herself and her people from death and tyranny.
The Homecoming Parade was way fun. But the events following are what's really left in my memory roladex file.
*Embroider eyes with black
Forward or back. Which way do I go?
"I should have been more particular concerning the building of the hop-kiln but there are so many of them to be seen about Canterbury and Farnham that everyone may be easily satisfied of their structure". (1)
8 flour tortillas (8-inch) (I used crushed tortilla chips instead because that is what I had on hand)
Randy Singer’s “The Last Plea Bargain” is a gripping story about the intricacies of the justice system and how far both defense attorneys and prosecutors will go for their clients and reputations. From the first page to the last, Singer never disappoints. As a veteran trial attorney, Singer has been called the Christian John Grisham. He was recently a finalist with John Grisham and Michael Connelly for the inaugural Harper Lee Prize for Legal Fiction sponsored by the University of Alabama School of Law and the ABA Journal. Click here to visit his website.
As you can see in the above pictures, the forsythia was in bloom. We have a forsythia bush in my backyard in New York. To me, it’s just as amazing as seeing cherry blossoms bloom. The yellow is just so vibrant and beautiful.
You cannot rebuild the rule of law through extralegal means. Unfortunately, this is a lesson that not enough people have learned, and I think the cost to Mali will be much greater than that of two sacks of charcoal.
Sorry, but I see no reason to think any sort of “course correction” is inevitable. The latest ideological lurch of the Republican Party came after two consecutive cycles in which the party was beaten like a drum. But it also drifted to the right during every recent Republican presidency; there’s a reason that GOPers were muttering about the “betrayals of conservative principle” their chieftains were exhibiting during W.’s, second term, his father’s one term, and yes, even Ronald Reagan’s second term. Like the tax cuts for the wealthy that are their all-purpose economic policy proposal, a shift to the right has become the all-purpose response to any political development over more than three decades. The Tea Party Movement is simply the latest incarnation of the conservative movement, which has been thundering against RINOs all the way back to the days when they actually existed.
Something a special someone sent me today on Whatsapp, about my horoscope, and I find this really amazing:
The representatives of the French people, organized as a National Assembly, believing that the ignorance, neglect, or contempt of the rights of man are the sole cause of public calamities and of the corruption of governments, have determined to set forth in a solemn declaration the natural, unalienable, and sacred rights of man, in order that this declaration, being constantly before all the members of the Social body, shall remind them continually of their rights and duties; in order that the acts of the legislative power, as well as those of the executive power, may be compared at any moment with the objects and purposes of all political institutions and may thus be more respected, and, lastly, in order that the grievances of the citizens, based hereafter upon simple and incontestable principles, shall tend to the maintenance of the constitution and redound to the happiness of all.
But we will pick ourselves up. We will begin the hunt anew, even more focused.
I can't say that I loved the film, but I didn't love the book either. I definitely appreciate the genius of Ishiguro and what he accomplishes in so many different ways. How he manages to going from a calm book about a butler and his worldview to a startling mental thriller really baffles me. For that, I give the author kudos. As for the film, I think I need more time to mull it over.
I've posted this one previously and it has turned up on a couple of other blogs recently. A totally eclectic mix but it sets me wondering where and why. There has to be a story.
It’s also major off season. This means A) The rates are cheap and B) There’s no one staying there.
Online registration is now open for the “National Press Club 5K: Beat the Deadline” race in Washington, D.C., on July 17, 2010. The Press Club’s 13th annual run/walk will begin at 8:00 a.m. on the corner of 14th and F Sts. NW, outside the historic National Press Building, “the place where news happens.”
Left Hand Smoke Jumper
Even now there is still always some kind of crap I have to deal with because of him (as if the kids and their issues weren't enough for me to deal with already)...example, 2 weeks ago he claims he forgot his keys and wallet (with $600 in it) in his car in a bad neighborhood and they were stolen...the keys had the car key too but the car wasn't taken..yeah fishy story huh? well whomever had keys had our address cuz his license was in wallet so I had to run out, buy new deadbolts and change the locks which meant canceling Bella's therapy that morning. The next week he lost the key to our shed and had to cut the lock off that, then the other day he lost the key to our garage (which is where I keep the ladder for pool, water slide and all the kids yard toys) so I had to cut the lock open to get in there....how stupid can one person be? this is the same man who has locked his keys in car more then 20 times in 1 year.
RINSE AND REPEAT is complete at just over 61,000 words. I would be happy to provide a partial or complete manuscript for further review.
1. “cats watching a pot”
In a stand mixer metal bowl add the egg whites and sugar. Place the bowl over a pot of simmering water. Heat the whites and sugar until sugar is dissolved, whisking constantly. With your fingers, rub the liquid between your fingers to detect any undissolved sugar granules. Remove the mixture from over the simmering water and place on stand mixer fitted with whip attachment. Starting at low speed, beat 5 minutes and gradually increase speed until meringue is stiff and shiny.
Read this amazing Reddit thread of how one man's tragic attack at a Kenyan orphange lead to major funds being raised for the children under his care.
We've ordered the nine-course degustation ($190) but I'm already getting worried about my stomach capacity and we haven't even officially started the first course. A natural silence descends over the table, and we marvel wordlessly over the intricate plating required for each dish. What stands out most is how quiet and calm the staff are in the kitchen. Computer screens installed in the kitchen are used to keep track of orders, but conversation levels are barely much above a murmur between chefs.
Oh, one more thing on bringing the audience into the unnatural world. There’s that excellent use of the Internet viral video, which Luke shows Claire early on in the movie. She watches the spartanly furnished room, through the web camera footage, waiting for a ghost to appear and when the feed cuts to a shock screaming face, Claire falls for it big time. This happens four minutes in and set’s a tone for the movie, which stays with me throughout. We understand that she and Luke play these kind of pranks on each other, although where Luke really does want to believe, Claire still only thinks it’s a laugh. Which is why when she straps on the equipment and starts recording ambience audio in the hotel at night, at Luke’s request to help him prove that there’s something else there but them, we start to empathise with her. And it’s through her – the sceptic – which we start to move into the world where a haunting could be possible. Again the viral video and the nightmare shock play into the hand of the sceptic. Not real, but tricks or imagination it gives us the same mind-set as Claire. When Claire starts to hear sounds on the recordings and see things in the dark, we too accept them as we now realize that this is no prank, or a dream. It’s really happening.
Maybe that snot would worry less about being cool if he spent a week in Haiti, where cholera is claiming lives because people are bathing in and drinking water from street canals. Or maybe he'd like a free trip to Mulletville, where Chuck recently encountered a grown man crying at a Walmart register. The man finally had enough to buy his son a birthday present. The kid's birthday was back in April. The present was a box of LEGOs.
Businesses have a mission statement so why shouldn’t people!
Once I had my shopping for gifts over with I got busy with the traditional cookie baking.
Kiss Me Dancer by Alicia and Roy Street
I even cleared off my standing desk. It was bad, real bad. Funny how the I MUST SAVE THIS TINY SCRAP becomes "meh" when purging. It's very therapeutic. :) While cleaning my desk, I found some stamps that needed to be put away, and while I was in the Holiday stamp drawer, I spied some Memory Box dies. *lightbulb* I went through them, and lo and behold, I found my tree die!! Whoot!
This is one that has some degree of controversy, but I still love it. It is particularily useful in those "Haldol" allergic patients. It's result is predictable, immediate, and very satisfying to to deploy. Some of you may have seen it. The Tazer!
1436 D-IX/22/2002. “St. John Chrysostom and the Jews.” St. John Chrysostom Episcopal Church, Chicago, Illinois.
It was an absolute delight, reading some of the comments on different ME/CFS forums.
2 delighted
No lustre from the star is lost, and not
How it was nothing short of an actual miracle that the embassy granted us an appointment when they did--it was.
H: Chocolate Milk! It was yummy.
I really don't think I deserved the amount or quality of incredible gifts I received, but I'm really thankful. We give gives to our loved ones on holidays, not because we are expected to but because we want to. We do this to give a silent reminder to that we are grateful for them, celebrating another year together. Obvious point there. But at Christmas time nothing is better than watching everyone slowly open their gifts, laughing and smiling, while Michael Buble's holiday Cd plays in the background. Just being together is the best gift.. as cheesy as that sounds.
We're currently in the process of dealing with a few things:
Absorbing whatever I can find
and given that most people reaching my blog are currently searching for material about pasties (searches include: “Francis Maude pasties”; “Newsnight pasties”; “Paxman on pasties”; “pastie tories”; “Paxman on pies”; “are there any jokes about pasties?”; “pasty tax on newsnight”; “youtube clip of Jeremy Paxman with a pasty” &c), this seems appropriate:
Watching some of my friends perform this weekend, walking with other friends and having the most thought provoking conversations, being inspired by tales and accomplishments of other friends, or even simply proudly making connections with brilliant and open friends of theirs, all made me realize how fortunate of a life I am living.
Since 2001, Global Research has established an international network of authors, scholars and investigative journalists. Global Research counts among its regular contributors a number of prominent writers, researchers and academics as well as several promising young authors.
- 1/4 tsp salt
This week, we took L. to a specialist because I wanted to follow up on some advice I’d gotten about maybe supplementing his diet with some fatty acids, among other things. He’s still doing great, but with Kindergarten coming up in the fall and some problems persisting even though J. and I both felt he’d conquered those phases, it seemed like a good idea to take another step towards making sure we looked into every possible avenue to keep him functioning at his best level. In other words, I had that sort of weird gnawing Mommy sense that there was something else that needed to be done for my kid, and I went skipping off to go find it. Unfortunately, while I found the specialist who would help us with the fatty acids and the probiotics and so forth, I also found that she wanted us to eliminate all gluten and casein from L.’s diet.
And then we headed down to the warehouse section. For our canned goods, we ended up buying six single shelves (only $4.99 each!) and a dozen brackets (only .50 each!). Then, we headed to aisle 28 to pick up the bunk bed.
I hope this job will help point me in the right direction in life; I know it felt right for a reason.
It is not enough to begin to pray, nor to pray aright;
not only did it feel good to walk upon the historical brick walkway
The boys gave heed to their mothers petition for care with their new blades. They roamed the countryside, looking for dragons, monsters and furies... protecting the world around them and those that they loved... as all wonderful little boys do.
The burgers offer much better value. The burger with the lot is a hungry man's bounty: a teetering stack of beef patty, bacon, tomato, lettuce, cheese, onion, beetroot and fried egg. It's simple but hearty, and the patty looks and tastes homemade.
The major leaders who convened for the peace conference in Paris in January 1919 were concerned mainly with fashioning a settlement in Europe. But Europeans were not the only ones who had high hopes for the conference. For colonized, marginalized, and stateless peoples from all over the world — Chinese and Koreans, Arabs and Jews, Armenians and Kurds, and many others — the conference appeared to present unprecedented opportunities to pursue the goal of self-determination. They could now take the struggle against imperialism to the international arena, and their representatives set out for Paris, invited or otherwise, to stake their claims in the new world order. A largely unintended but eager audience for Wilson’s wartime rhetoric, they often imagined the president as both an icon of their aspirations and a potential champion of their cause, a dominant figure in the world arena committed, he had himself declared, to the principle of self-determination for all peoples.
Yes, hit another milestone and baby is doing well. She has flunked every NST at the Peri's office. However, has passed the BPP with flying colors. Friday night we got slammed by that awful snow storm. Dh and I had an argument about the driveway being blown out. The car (Ford Explorer in 4 wheel drive) got stuck in the snow. SO I got mad and went and bought a new snowblower since I hated the other one so much. Only to fall in the snow 4 times trying to get through the driveway. Which earned me a trip to L&D for monitoring by my ob. Which then turned into the nurse giving me the riot act for being out on bedrest. Yeah, my ob forgot when he was talking to me on the phone. He sure as heck remembered by the time the nurse gave him test results. I was told that he said that I was NOT to be out of bed. That I was to go home, go to bed and put feet up. I was not allowed to get out except to pee. The nurse said and you KNOW you were supposed to be on bedrest. YIKES. Totall freaking busted. Which will make for an interesting situation when it turns January and dh goes back to work. Who will pick up the girls from school and daycare when he works late. So I think I may be seeing if the inlaws can pick Sara up from daycare for the the last few weeks.
I highly recommend Nightmare (more than I thought I would to be honest) and if you missed last night's screening, a special edition of Nightmare is available from Code Red DVD. See it for the lapels, see it for the gore, see it for the dubious parenting choices but most of all, see it.
The Pomona writer—last week, before leaving for LA, I met four of my students, my favorites, and we walked down Michigan Avenue. First we drank tea and spoke of various limitations and life, and then –also so beautiful, each one—we walked to hear Claudia Rankine read and speak--
I would like to take the kids to visit either a few of our shut-ins or bring cards to DeVos Childen's Hospital. (I have a call into DeVos to see if this is okay?) We do not do this enough and I think this is a great opportunity to do it.
Boy 1: I'm going to the bar. Do you want anything?
well, i have been diagnosed with COLITIS and i am NOT HAPPY!! :( it has been what has caused i think my recovery from my surgery to go soooooooooo slow!! i am either HAPPY or MISERABLE due to my tummy...really no in between! and a week ago, i TRIED taking some antibiotics that my dr prescribed for me and i was SOOOOO NAUSEATED, i couldn't stand it and i stopped taking it....then tuesday, he put me on a NEW medication called VANCOMYOCIN and it is a formulary medication and the last ditch effort before....i have to be admitted into the hospital to be treated there....and i SURE don't need or WANT that!!!! soooo, even though this stuff is NASTY, i am doing well on it and taking it and NO NAUSEA!! :) i have to take it every 6 hours for 10 days....i WILL DO IT!! so far so good....i just want to END all of this and keep moving FORWARD...i am still having signs of reflux but i think it has more to do with all this COLITIS stuff than real reflux...my tummy is just not the same right now! :( anyway, all could be WORST so i am VERY BLESSED!!! i had a MISERABLE day on monday night/tuesday....i was up on monday night from 1000pm all the way to 4am on the toilet and slept in a CHAIR next to the bathroom...MISERABLE! AND then tuesday, i was just BEAT...i felt HORRIBLE..adn then i had to go to the dr and that was when he gave me the new med....i PRAY this helps...A WONDERFUL friend of mine prayed for me/with me on tuesday and i KNOW that is what helped me....i have been forgetting to PRAY for MYSELF! i pray for others but rarely for myself....and when i do, they are answered...i just need to remember MYSELF!!!
I wondered about a couple of the names I found on my map, and whether they, too, are references to Native Americans. I wouldn’t mind living in Round Head, though I’m not sure if that’s a title a native warrior would cherish. Still, it’s better than Round Bottom, or worse, Long Bottom.
raisin
It has an audio output jack (full quarter-inch /guitar jack, not the eight-inch/headphones jack). That jack is plugged in with a converter that converts it to 2 RCA (left, right) cables. Those cables are 50 feet long and run through a hole in the ceiling to upstairs. They are also both split via Y-adapters and go to the front-jacks on the downstairs stereo.
*** Think you could wear shoes that looked like THAT? Germany's Iris Shieferstein designs what she calls taxidermy fashions. (only she probably says it in German.) She uses hooves, various animal parts, and even ...
Hat Rack Hotel
Secondly, he is trying to rattle his neighbours, and hopefully enough to see them become complacent and drop points. This part of the mind-game is probably going to be the least successful, if at all. I think that after seeing United lose at Wigan, Mancini saw his chance to destabilise them with this, let’s be fair, pretty tame attempt at a mind-game.
Of course it is always the last place that you find it in...that's when you stopped looking...... I get so confused with that expression.
Check them out at the following dates:
Stir together the cream cheese, sour cream and ranch seasoning. Add the rest of the ingredients and stir until combined. Salt and pepper to taste.
“I thought we played hard. This wasn’t that we weren’t handling success. We didn’t get beat because we came in here overconfident and didn’t respect the opponent. We got beat by a better team today. It was clear.” – Bruce Pearl
I found school really difficult and I’m sure being dyslexic did have a small part in that.
Can you believe it? It has been 10 years and 9 months since September 11, 2001. And this week in New York City something amazing has progressed. One World Trade Center has officially become the tallest building in the city. It has surpassed One Bryant Park and it has surpassed the Empire State Building to “replace”, as stated by CNN, the Twin Towers. (No offense CNN, but “replace” doesn’t seem like a fitting word for this situation.) And it continues to grow…
And the reason? Because Dickens is such a generous writer, so prolific in his ideas, so prodigal with his plots and characters. I have always believed that he could have written a full-length novel about any one of his minor characters. And the physical descriptions are so memorable: Mr Vholes scratching with black-gloved hands at his pimples, Lady Tippins with her face like a reflection in a spoon, Mr Twemlow from the same novel, who is like an extra leaf in a dining table, inserted on certain occasions to make the dinner go more smoothly.
I was super glad to see someone else taking neighborhood cleanup seriously, though. Thanks, Neighborhood Teen, for making a difference!
So after the near universal outcry in regards to Mass Effect 3’s highly controversial ending, Bioware has decided that they are going to change the ending a bit so that it gives fans more closure and a more satisfying conclusion. First off I have to say I am very happy about this, as I’m sure are many fans. One of the big reasons for the dislike of the ending is the lack of closure, but I feel Bioware should also look into other things to consider when expanding on this ending. I am also aware that Bioware will not see this post but am putting it up regardless.
In town, Brennan loses his horse in a bet with his former boss and just as it seems he’ll have to walk all the way to the stagecoach way station to borrow a horse, he manages to hitch a lift in a coach transporting oily bookkeeper Willard Mims (John Hubbard) and his new bride Doretta Mims (Maureen O’Sullivan, the Jane from 1932’s “Tarzan The Ape Man”).
The material below is the petition:
Welcome to the Little Prince Blog Hop! If you have just stopped by thank-you so much. However, you will want to start at the beginning at www.homespunelegance.blogspot.com so that you don't miss any of the designer's projects, or the chance to be entered into our fabulous giveaways!
. . . walking through some thought forest,
PRINCETON, NJ — Americans are about as likely to say production of energy supplies (47%) should be prioritized as to say environmental protection (44%) should be, a closer division than last year, when energy led by 50% to 41%. These views mark a shift compared with the early 2000s, when Americans consistently assigned a higher priority to environmental protection.
Alright, back to reality.
And I realized that the terrorists' attempt to break our nation and bring us down had only united us under our flag, and made us stronger.
Let no one bewail his poverty, for the universal Kingdom has been revealed. Let no one weep for his iniquities, for pardon has shown forth from the grave. Let no one fear death, for the Saviour’s death has set us free. He that was held prisoner of it has annihilated it.
3) The humor in this book was priceless. I absolutely adored Perry. He's thrown into this completely crazy situation and has no idea what to do. So he bumbles around trying to figure out what's right while getting himself into every mess possible. And he's hilarious the entire time.
How liberating - I can now move on to page two;-)
The interval between data points two and three, which represents summer, trends downward. When I interviewed this particular student at the beginning of this year, it was evident (and admitted) that reading had also taken a vacation during the summer. The data points support this. Unfortunately, a short summer devoid of reading holds the potential to erase all gains made during the previous academic year. The following academic year is then spent attempting to recapture what a lack of summer reading has taken away. Yes, this student made progress this year. For that, I'm ecstatic. But that progress came with a cost because this student finished the year only slightly ahead of where they left off last academic year. All of this student's hard work during seventh grade barely surpassed the reading level left behind at the end of sixth grade. What does it look like when a student reads during the summer? See for yourself.
9 - Clayton McMichen's Georgia Wildcats - Bile Dem Cabbage Down - 2:46
The desecration of Templar cemeteries has sparked a full-scale investigation. Cade and his team suspect that a cabal of necromancers is behind it all. Their purpose: to claim the legendary powers of a lost holy relic for their own ungodly campaign.
*The Spring Cleaning Sale freebie is ONLY good for orders that require shipping. If your order is ONLY for digital products, you will NOT receive a freebie. We're sorry, but the shipping department cannot take requests for the freebie.
Among the Foodie Crowd, Nancy Silverton is well-known as the founder of LaBrea Bakery, which I will say revolutionized gourmet breads in Southern California. She is a particular champion of Sourdough Bread, which the French call “bread, the old way,” versus the more modern yeast.
Well, Benson sure is growing and it is so hard to think back just 5 months ago when he hadn't arrived yet. He is the perfect addition to our family and we love him SO much!
Following are excerpts from a lecture by Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Qatar TV on October 28, 2006.
Marketing Tips by,
to mind your life.
Fulford said legislators trampled on existing privatization law by ordering the Department of Corrections to seek proposals from private vendors to run 29 prisons and work camps. She found that the project violated state law because the agency failed to do a business-case study of the pros and cons of privatization before seeking proposals from vendors. The ruling emphasized that privatizing state prisons is allowed by law, but that the Legislature went about it the wrong way. It was a victory for the Florida Police Benevolent Association, the union for correctional officers, which filed suit in hopes of saving the jobs of several thousand correctional officers.
Border Punch - Martha Stewart
You are cordially invited to the Proteus Gowanus All Day Holiday Shopping Party!Sunday, December 19, 12-6 pm
I've always been an advocate of New Zealand beers. I spent a financially challenged week in a grim hostel in Auckland about 8 years ago. The purpose of my stay was purely Visa related; unfortunately. My bank balance didn't stretch any further than the local bottle shop and an unhealthy obsession with the 'Pokies'; which resulted in a loss far greater than a weeks spend; travelling around the North Island.
Is it bold to call this show one of the best ever? Probably. I understand that the show's comedy is very esoteric (get the connection), and therefore not necessarily appealing to a broad audience; but I personally have always been much more attracted to a show's whose comedy is a bit more nuanced, than those stupid Everybody Loves Raymond, laugh-track type, bullshit shows.
I found this mug a long time ago. It had a nice, hefty feel to it and it holds a LOT. It also appealed to the grunge in me at the time. This coffee mug made me happy. Then in December of 2009 it broke and I was devastated! Thus my journey into mug-land began.
The lemur, the world's largest nocturnal primate, taps its specialised middle finger on tree trunks to find nutritious beetle larvae.
Watch out. They are very slippery. (don't let your child eat them off the floor either...unless of course they get to them before you do)
Peese (Please)
I would also highly recommend searching on Pinterest to see Daily 5 boards. If you are like me, I have to see something in action to fully wrap my head around it.
In a 5 quart slow cooker, combine the peas, water, sausage, bouillon, carrot, celery, potatoes, garlic powder, oregano, bay leaves, and onion.
Earlier this week, the ministry reported in a reply to a parliamentary question that 1410 children under the age of 18 were murdered in 2007/08.
now taking writing seriously
Bottoms Up, Ejaculators!
Steven: Just kidding! I've always wanted to do that.
But you really can't appreciate the depths of the cluelessness of this meatball until you hear her advice for Best Buy on how to resurrect their rapidly decomposing carcass...
The pills just made the dog tired, Katz said.
And if I should fall into temptation,
Others, like Shmuel Rosner at the Jerusalem Post, have taken a different approach, bringing up the Jenin "massacre" reports to tarnish all and any critic of Israel, as though the fact that a lie was disseminated (possibly by the IDF in the first place) in 2002 could offset the satellite images showing an attack that took place outside the territorial waters of Israel. This is part of a troubling trend of Zios copycating Holocaust denial techniques (a single Holocaust lie, like that the Nazis made soap from Jews, proves that the Holocaust itself is a lie; a single bogus Holocaust survivor, like Binyamin Wilkomirski, proves that all survivors are impostors).
desperatly needing a vacuum just had carpets fitted and my vac has broken thank you"
If any of my readers have had foster children or adopted older children - PLEASE give me some advice on what to do when we meet her. I want her to feel safe and wanted.
The Palestine Film Festival has been running from 20th April and will continue until 3rd May. Middle East LDN were fortunate enough to attend the UK Premiere screening of Gaza Hospital, a film by Italian director Marco Pasquini. Here’s what we thought of it…
Then why pray?
We can see love,
Exciting news! As of last week, I am the Personal Vegan Chef to a wonderful East Sacramento family! Although I learned a lot about being a Personal Chef in theory in my time at Bauman College, this is the first real client I have had since graduating, and I am so grateful and excited for this opportunity and the hands on experience I will gain. So far it has been very fun and very challenging. Challenging, since I am actually having to make real recipes of my food in order to price meals out correctly! Something that is very foreign to me is taking the time to create actual recipes, so this is definitely a great way to start.
“Internal affairs are busy investigating the allegations made.
